INTRODUCTION.

I VENTURE to offer to the public the result of
considerable experience in the treatment of the
diseases of the feet, with a conviction that the
wish to be useful, however humble may be the
means, will be fairly appreciated. I do not

think that I have given an undue or an in-
ordinate consideration to what has

often looked upon as trifles. Those
have suffered from the diseases which

been too
who once
are the

subject

of this volume

will readily

acknowledge
that

I have not only laboured

upon the more ephemeral

annoyances

to which

flesh is heir to, but they can

b

vi INTRODUCTION.

readily judge, from the excruciating pain they have
undergone, that I have nothing exaggerated. The

largest portion of society, fortunately for them-
selves, can form no idea of the usefulness of such a

manual as I have drawn up. They have been taught
to look upon corns as in themselves so trivial a
source of complaint, and so easily remedied, as to
be of little moment. In this country especially they
have been considered as unworthy surgical skill.
In the same manner, fifty years since, attention

to the teeth was looked upon as a sort of un-
necessary waste of time. The dentist had neither

education nor skill ; he was looked upon as a
mere tooth- drawer, who might be useful in a
moment of pain. Now we see men of the

highest medical education embark in the profes-
sion, and the consequence is, a great improve-
ment not only in the appearance of persons in

society, but health is much improved, and longevity
is more common. Old people are enabled to

INTRODUCTION. vii

masticate their food by artificial means, and thus
digestion is more easily and more advantageously
performed. But a few years since a horse- doctor
was looked upon as an ignorant pretender, and his
advice only taken when the hope of recovery of
an animal was abandoned. The good sense of a
large portion of the community was at length
directed to many points connected with the
diseases of horses. We have now a Royal

Veterinary College, with professors and accom-
plished men belonging to it, and an experienced

man in that branch of knowledge is regarded
with respect and esteem. It is not improbable
that before any great length of time has elapsed
Chiropodists will be admitted to their place
in the social system ;
and colleges disdain to
teachers men who have

nor will the hospitals
receive amongst their
studied the diseases of
the feet, now unfortunately so little known and
so completely disregarded. Beauty of carriage

viii INTRODUCTION.

is mainly dependent on the judicious preservation
of the feet, and in vain is the body drilled by
the dancing master or by the serjeant if the great
support of the whole frame be in a disordered
state. Personal comfort will be lost without
care ; besides which, as maladies advance, all
locomotion is prevented, and hence a phalanx
not only of corporeal but mental sufferings
springs up.

I trust that those who read my
volume will feel that I have sought to add
something to the means that we possess of

mitigating disease, and that I have not at-
tempted to expatiate upon a subject with which

I am not thoroughly acquainted. I have pointed

out the great results of personal experience, be-
sides those which I derived from pursuing my

studies under competent authority abroad. On
the Continent the Chiropodist is estimated as
a public benefactor, and has the power of
teaching others, and demonstrating such modes

INTRODUCTION. ix

of practice as he himself is most familiar with.
In every large town in Germany he pays
periodically his visit to the different families
under his own immediate care. Most of the
courts have upon their staff of medical men
some Chiropodists ; in this enlightened country
I am not aware that there is one hospital
specially having a professor who devotes his
time to the subject.
There are many minutiæ upon which there is
little occasion to dwell in a work of this class,
which I have necessarily omitted, and I am
fully aware that there are repetitions ; but they
have been unavoidable, because there are opinions
which I have advanced which cannot be too

forcibly impressed upon those to whom the en-
joyment of life's best blessings is not only an

object as far as they themselves are concerned,
but who would guard the young, and those who
are dearest to them, from encountering sufferings
с

X INTRODUCTION.

which, by caution and attention, may be avoided.
The principal subject of my examination has
been the affections to which the feet are liable ;
but I have not confined myself to them, I have
ventured upon points which have likewise been
carefully studied by me, and on which I trust
it will be found that I have been enabled to
throw some light-namely, the management of
the hand, which scarcely any writer has touched
upon. I have attempted to give such original
views as presented themselves to my mind ; and
if, upon mature reflection, I have thought it
right to express any opinions which may be
at variance with those generally received, I hope
that the desire I have had in view, of being

useful, will plead my excuse. I have through-
out attempted, as far as I could, to write in

plain and unadorned language ; and when it is
borne in mind that I am not a native of this
country, and that during the period at which I

INTRODUCTION. xi

was pursuing my studies I was at a German
university, I entertain little doubt that my efforts
will be viewed without that critical examination

which even the most erudite and polished per-
formances are sometimes unable to meet. There

are very few works, either in the Latin, French,
German, or English, upon the subject of my
consideration, and I have therefore ventured to
add one to the number, which may be found
to contain matter that may serve as a guide to
those who would hereafter desire to add their own
experience, and I shall have fulfilled my anxious
desire to be of use to my fellow beings, if I am the
means of arresting the attention of parents, of
inducing them to take proper precautions, and of
alleviating those sufferings to which human nature

is unfortunately liable. It would be presump-
tuous in me to expect that any great success

may attend my literary labours, but should I
be as fortunate in gaining the kind opinions

xii INTRODUCTION.

of my readers as I have been of my patients,
by my unremitting anxiety to excel in the
profession I have selected, I shall not consider
the time I have employed in compiling these
sheets thrown away, or regret that I have
ventured to become an author.

CONTENTS.

CHAPTER I.
Beauty of the mechanism of the human foot
The investigation rarely pursued
Sydenham points out the necessity for the attention of
surgeons
Upright position of man dependent on the structure of
the foot
Anatomy of the integuments
Epidermis
Rete mucosum
Cutis vera
Abrasion of the epidermis highly dangerous
Examination of the epidermis by anatomists
Formation of the rete mucosum
Seat of corns
Cutis vera, its power of imbibition, seat of sensation
Pressure not the sole cause of corns
Alteration of structure produced

PAGE
1
2

3

4
5
6
6
7
7
8
11
11
12
13
15
b

ii CONTENTS.

PAGE
Injury of rete mucosum a cause of corns 16
Loss of vitality in the new-formed layers 17
First development of corns not always painful
Effects of impediment to the capillary circulation
Beauty ofthe ancient sculptures as regards the foot
The sandal
The shoe
The general carelessness of the feet
Danger of sudden check to the perspiration of the feet
Uses of the foot-bath to restore perspiration
Sir Charles Bell's anatomy
The power of the toes to support the human body
The long practice necessary for the dancer
The muscular motion necessary for walking
Shoes too often made of inflexible material
Indiscriminate purchase of shoes and boots
Mischief from bad shoemakers
Choice of leather for shoes

18
20
21
22
23
24
25
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
31
32
Old shoes ought to be the model for a new pair 33
Waterproof shoes 33
Supple leather 35
Minute nerves and blood vessels of the foot 36
Touch of a nervous fibrilla source of pain 37
Close resemblance of the external tissues of vegetables to
those of animals 38

Convulsions, lock-jaw, and death have followed upon inju-
dicious attempts to remove corns 39

CONTENTS. iii

Roots of corns
Definition of corns
Classification of corns

CHAPTER II.

PAGE
41
42
43
Division of indurations into genera 44
Clavus durus, hard corn 45
Clavus mollis, soft corn 46
Clavus niger, black corn 49
Clavus sanguineus, bleeding corn 50
Chemical examination of the substance forming corns 52
Various tests employed 53
Immersion in hot and cold water 54
Seat of corns externally 55
Corns under the nail of the great toe 56
Near the little toe 56
Roots of the nails
Soles ofthe feet and the heels

56
57

Operations for removal of corns
Specifics for corns fallacious
Danger of having recourse to the knife
Attention in slight cases

58
60
62
63

Empirics' narration of cases often fallacious
Instances of death from individuals cutting their corns
Case in Edinburgh
Dreadful effects of a wound of the nerves
My own mode of operation

65
66
66
67
- 68

iv CONTENTS.
Self-possession necessary
Position of patient and operator
Detachment of corns the object to be had in view -
Paring away of the hard induration
Necessary to watch the efforts of nature after extraction
The tact and judgment required for success
Self- confidence of the ignorant Chiropodist leads to danger
Hæmorrhage follows upon rash operations ·
Scalpel or knife not necessary for extracting corns
Method of handling instruments
Operation to be discontinued if blood be perceptible
Roots of corns to be searched for
Immersion in hot water before and after operation
Friction with pumice stone, scuttle- fish, files
Balsams and tinctures insufficient -

PAGE
69
69
70
72
73
74
75
76
· 77
78
79
80
80
81
81
Uses of herbs 82
The house-leek
Employment of acids

8888 82
83
Corns in the sole 84
Cork soles 84
Diseases of the head occasioned by various states of the feet -
85
Soft linings for shoes to be avoided 85
Changes from the country to London producing corns 86
Effects of the pavement and of the roads in the country 87
Weather influencing corns 88
Electric states of the atmosphere 88
Silk to be worn as a non-conductor of electricity 88

CONTENTS. V

Electric sparks given off by the human body
The nervous temperament exhibits singular phenomena
Hygrometrical inquiry necessary ·
Weight of atmosphere on the human body
Effects of exhaustion of air
Corns should be attended to in early youth
Difficulty of eradication greater in advanced age
The earlier the attention paid the better
Will recur if not taken in time
The dark corns more especially demand attention
Corns between the toes most troublesome
Pain not always an indication of their severity
Promptitude necessary where inflammation occurs
Neglect often renders them dangerous and difficult of cure
Lieut. -Col. Hawker's instructions
His recipe

PAGE
89
89
9000
90
91
92
92
93
94
· 95
95
· 96
96
97
98
99
· 100
100
- 101
101
- 102
103
103
104
104
· 105

The bad results which follow upon his recommendation
Diachylon plaster, with holes for corns, injudicious
Sudden disappearance of corns
Diseases appearing to relieve them, fallacious
Metastasis
Small рох, diseases of the kidnies
Effects of horizontal position
Change of climate ·
The continental nations
Necessity of watchfulness
·

с

vi CONTENTS.

Definition of the bunnion

CHAPTER III.

Often confounded with corns and callosities
Seat of bunnion
State ofthe great toe
Result of pressure in the first instance
Mistaken for constitutional disease
Diagnosis between bunnion and gout
Diseases ofjoints
Treatment of the bunnion
Cold and warm applications
Discrimination necessary

PAGE
- 106
- 106
·· 107
- 107
108
· 108
· 109
- 111
112
112
- 113
Method of producing resolution of inflammation · 114
Plan to be pursued - 115
Leeches to be avoided 115
The foot must be carefully examined, as mistakes have arisen 116
Sydenham's description of gout
Presence of inflammation

- 117
118

CHAPTER IV.

Definition of callosity
Seat of the affection
Two bunnions cannot appear at the same time on the same
119
119

foot 120
Callosity mistaken for it 120
A corn in the centre of the indurated mass - 121

CONTENTS. vii

Callosities come on insidiously, producing little pain
Similar indurations on the palms of the hands, or the
knees
Callosities eradicated by simple means

PAGE
122

Often affect sedentary people ·
State of the epidermis
Nature's attempt at relief
Induration on the apex of the great toe
Gradual appearance
Embracing much of the papillæ of the great toe

· 122
· 124
- 125
126
· 126
· 127
- 127
- 128

CHAPTER V.

Warts, definition of 129
John Hunter's opinion 129

Causes of warts
Seat of the disorder

Less troublesome now than they formerly were
Different theories advanced
Humoral pathologists

130
Difference between the structure of the wart and the corn · 130
- 131
· 131
132
· 132
Sometimes evidently connected with the constitution · 133
Connected with other diseases · 134
Cancerous tendency
Contagion
Predisposition

· 134
· 134
135
Diseased action 135

viii CONTENTS .

In some situations productive of great irritation
Cases in which they are mistaken for corns
Interesting case
Popular superstitions
Charms, spells
Boerrhaave and Sauvage, their credulity
Instances of superstition
Effect of vegetables -
The ranunculacea
The umbelliferæ
Numerous recommendations
Corroding remedies -
Excision
Neutral salts
The hydrochlorates of ammonia and lime
Nitric acid
Ligature
Warts on the soles of the feet
Attention necessary

PAGE
136
137
137
- 138
- 139
140
140
141
· 141
· 143
- 145
- 146
146
· 146
- 147
· 148
148
149
· 149

CHAPTER VI.
Management of the feet at an early age inculcated
System of the greatest importance
The pedestrian may be enabled to follow up his journey
by care for a great length of time
Cleanliness

151
153
❤ 153
154

CONTENTS. ix

The warm pediluvium
Sir Astley Cooper's plan
Hot water renders the feet too susceptible
Use of the sponge
Perspiration of the feet
Change of stockings
General rules to be laid down
Occasional deviations according to circumstances
Time for bathing
Varicose veins
Summer and winter bathing
Friction
Feet to be made perfectly dry
Sponging morning and evening
Silk stockings
Woollen stockings
Cotton stockings
Stockings for ball- rooms, for walking exercise
Stockings too short highly objectionable

PAGE
- 155
· 155
- 156
· 157
· 158
- 158
·. 159
- 159
- 160
·· 160
· 161
161
· 162
162
· 163
- 163
· 164
165
166

CHAPTER VII.

The economy of the nails of great importance - 167
The uses in uncivilized life · 168
The formation
Necessity for watching their growth
Healthy expansion

d
·
168
. 169
· 169

X CONTENTS .

PAGE

Tender toes
Rapid growth of nails inconvenient
Deviations from a normal state

170
170
- 171
Cutting them to be attended to · · 171
Dangers from their proximity to nerves
Alterations of structure requiring attention
Splitting, cracking, exfoliation, to be remedied
Mechanical injuries

· 172
· 172
· 173
· 173
Loss ofthe nail · 174
Reproduction
Periodical attention
Alterations that occur in time
Indications of health and disease from the nails
Objects to be attained by attention to them
Irregular growth how obviated
Method of operating

· 174
- · 175
·· 176
- 177
· 178
179
· 179
Treatment under various altered conditions - 180

CHAPTER VIII.
Chilblains, their frequent occurrence in early life
Character of the tumor -
Seat in different parts of the body
Different stages
Acceleration of arterial blood
Retardation of venous blood
Owing to the carelessness of the guardians of youth

181
· 182
183
183
· 184
· 184
185

CONTENTS . xi

Mode of prevention
Cure of the first stage
Cure of the second stage
Ulceration and cure
Regimen to be pursued
Mortification and treatment externally
The stages of mortification
Internal treatment

CHAPTER IX.

PAGE
186
· 186
· 187
- 188
- . 189
· 190
191
192

The Bridgewater treatise on the hand - 193
Sensibility of the cuticle
Sir Charles Bell's work on the hand
The dermoid coverings

· 194
· 195
· 196

The epidermis, its various thickness
Rete mucosum, its peculiarity
Perspiration of the hand
Temperature of the hand indication of health or disease
Delicacy or roughness of the skin of great importance
Shape of the fingers influencing the touch

· 197
· 198
· 198
· 199
· 199
- 200
Whiteness and delicacy of the hand 201
Dangerous attempts to produce them 201
Cosmetics 202
Nails to be early watched 202
Inattention prevents proper transpiration 203
Shape of the nails indicates disease 203
Regularity of growth and attention 204

xii CONTENTS.
Nail brushes
Blunt instruments for removing sordes ·

Numerous muscles called into action on playing the piano-
forte ·

Too much extension of the fingers injurious
Brilliant execution difficult, and sometimes hurtful
Too much exertion unnatural
The mechanism of the thumb
-

Its anatomy necessary for power, action, and expression
The Romans' ease in gesticulation -
Without the thumb the hand would be useless
Dexterity dependent upon it
Exemplified in writing
Illustrations of its necessity
Detergents
Cutaneous affections
Gloves
Changes according to the season
Effect upon eruptions, discolorations
Necessity of attention to in youth

PAGE
205
205

206
· 207
207
· 208
208
209
· 210
211
212
212
213
214
215
- 216
216
216
· 217

CONTENTS. xiii

APPENDIX.

THE STRUCTURE OF THE HUMAN FOOT WELL WORTH THE STUDY.

The foot composed of 36 bones and 36 joints
Necessary for flexibility and elasticity
Its shape and form -
Evolutions it is capable of performing
Attitudes -
Equilibrium, how preserved
Modern art of dancing
Art of dancing in ancient Rome
Art of dancing in modern Italy
Noverre's treatise
The French Encyclopædia
Blasis' treatise
Foot of the horse, camel, elephant
Upright position of man accounted for
The chimpanzee
Construction of the bones of the foot
Articulation of the bones
Constituents of the bones
Comparative anatomy
Enumeration of the bones ofthe foot
The tarsus
The astragalus

PAGE
221
· 222
223
224
· 225
226
226
226
❤ 227
224
· 228
- 228
229

;

- 230
231
232
233
234
235
235
236
236
e

xiv CONTENTS
.

Os calcis
Os naviculare
Os cuboides
Cuneiform bones
The metatarsus
Arches of the foot
Muscles of the foot
The toes
Cellular substance

PAGE
237
238
238
238
- 239
240
243
- 249
252

DISEASES

OF

THE FEET.

THE mechanism of each part of the human
frame has been acknowledged by every one capable
of examining it, to be calculated to excite the
wonder and admiration of all intelligent beings.
The beautiful adaptation of each organ to perform
the function for which it was destined has struck
every inquirer into the harmony of Nature ; and
although in investigating the causes and effects
of disease and of decay, we may be baffled in
many of our researches, we are permitted to

B

2 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

collect together a vast mass of facts which still
further inspire a love of knowledge, and an
ardent desire to become acquainted with as
much as our intellectual powers are capable of
acquiring. This curiosity properly stimulated has

led to the culture of those sciences deeply im-
portant to mankind, which are known under

the name of Medicine. A number of the most
intelligent members of society have handed down
from age to age means by which suffering might
be alleviated and life prolonged ; but many most
important infirmities have been scarcely touched
upon, either from the rarity of their occurrence

or from their being considered unworthy the at-
tention of men of superior intellect. Amongst

the affections to which we are liable, but which
have scarcely met the investigation which they
require, are those to which the Feet are subject.
They have been generally deemed of so trivial
a nature as to be unworthy serious inquiry, and

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 3

they have consequently been consigned to a class
of men whose supreme ignorance has thrown
obloquy upon those who have both the wish and
the power to do good. In the present day we
find a large portion of the community, from the
highest to the lowest, subject to severe suffering
from the inattention of Surgeons to those points,
although at the period at which medical science
may be said to have dawned, the greatest of
the English Physicians, Sydenham, expresses his
anxiety that skilful operators should not disdain
to devote their attention to this neglected portion
of their duties . However trivial may appear the
inconveniences which attend upon maladies of
the Feet, and however they may be sneered at

as beneath the dignity of science, they neverthe-
less demand that they should meet with attention ;

and amply will the inquirer be repaid by the
information which he must gain, and the power
he will possess of being a contributor to the

4 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

ease, if not the happiness, of mankind. The
exquisite beauty of the mechanism of the hand,
its influence upon the social, nay, the intellectual
happiness of man, has been the theme of one
of the first philosophers of the age, and if equal
talent and power were devoted to the inquiry
and the construction of the Foot, its singular
arrangement of parts, its uses in the great
economy of nature, we may affirm that it would
not afford less subject for ingenious speculation ,
nor for admiration of Him that framed it. It
would require little skill to show that even our
enjoyment of intellect, and our capability of

deriving from creation around us the best bless-
ings, are mainly dependent upon that organization

by which our locomotion is performed, our power
" cœli convexum tueri, " and to hold that upright
form, which essentially distinguishes man from all
the living beings which the hand of Nature has
so profusely made.

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 5

Physiologists have with praiseworthy diligence
examined into the anatomy of the integuments of
the human body, both with a view to becoming
acquainted with the structure and with the uses
for which they are destined, but although there
has been minute microscopic examination, we
find that we are not completely conversant with

all the matters connected with them. The in-
teresting investigations pursued both by the late

Dr Wallace, of Dublin, and by Mr Judd, have
not sufficiently elucidated a subject still wrapt
in much obscurity ; we have, however, attained
sufficient knowledge to explain most of the
phenomena which we witness. We find that
there are three tissues to which the name of
dermoid coverings is given, each performing

certain functions necessary to the healthy con-
dition of the body, and each liable to certain

deviations from the normal state, which are pro-
ductive of pain and disorder. The first of these

C

6 DISEASES OF THE feet.

tissues is a membrane, varying in its degrees
of thickness, distributed over the surface of the
human body, to which the name of epidermis is
given the second is a congeries of vessels from
which is constantly issuing a secretion which
lubricates the under surface of the epidermis. To
this tissue, from its resemblance to a collection
of net-work, and from the exudation which is
always pouring forth from it, the term rete
mucosum has been applied ; beneath this is that
covering which from its exquisite sensibility, and
from its being apparently the natural seat of
sensation, has been called the cutis vera, or true
skin ; its upper surface receives from the rete
mucosum a portion of its secretion. Each of
these tissues appears to have been considered
absolutely necessary for the welfare of the human
being ; they protect him from the agency of
external causes, which would prove pernicious to
him ; whilst at the same time they enable him

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 7

to enjoy all those gratifications which arise from
the sense of touch so generally diffused over the
whole of the external system. The epidermis, a
thick layer in most parts of the body, prevents
the imbibition into the system of any deleterious

matter, and its absence from accident is pro-
ductive of the greatest mischief. Its abrasion

has been known to be the source of danger and
of death. The poison of the mad dog is drank
in as soon as it is penetrated ; prussic acid kills
when applied to the skin, when deprived of it .

The celebrated Scharinger, of Vienna, having rub-
bed upon his arm a small quantity of prussic

acid highly concentrated, included a small spot

where the epidermis was wanting, and instan-
taneous death followed. A minister in France,

under the care of Majendie, was poisoned in a

moment by the application of the smallest ap-
preciable quantity of strychnine to a part of the

skin which had been denuded of its epidermis.

8

DISEASES

OF
THE
FEET
.

This tissue resists in a singular manner the
ordinary decay to which the human body is subject ;
it is not unusual, on the discovery of a corpse which
has been for years beneath the surface of the earth,
to find that the epidermis has remained almost
uninjured, and the external appearance of the
frame has led to the belief that the usual process to
which nature has recourse for the removal of dead

animal matter has not occurred, but upon closer ex-
amination it has been seen that the epidermis alone

presents this appearance. In coffins large masses
are found when the rest of the body has decayed
away, sometimes the whole of the portion covering
the foot is seen apparently in its normal state. The

formation of this tissue is not thoroughly under-
stood, but the general impression is that it arises

out of the secretion of the subjacent mucous tissue.
Its structure has been closely examined ; Malpighi,
Grew, Lewenhoeck, have been the authorities upon
which most anatomists have rested ; but upon some

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 9

of the most important facts there are discrepancies
of opinion into which it is unnecessary for me to
enter, but which prove how difficult it is, upon a
subject apparently easily investigated, and which is
interesting to all, to arrive at conclusions satisfactory
to us. We are, however, certain that this tissue
is formed of numerous laminæ, or scales, which
overlap each other, much as do the tiles that
protect the upper part of a house. It has
even been asserted that the ingenuity with which
we roof in the coverings of our domiciles to
prevent the action of rain, and of external

mischief, is apparently the most insignificant imi-
tation of the structure which protects man's person

from the agency of similar inconveniences. The
microscope exhibits the epidermis to be much of
the same character as the scales which protect fish,
and the magnifying power of the hydro-oxygen

microscope has unfolded some very curious circum-
stances which connect themselves with points of

•

D

10 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

importance relating to this external covering. The
only object which demands the attention of the
Chiropodist, with regard to the physiology of the
integument, is as to the manner of its production,
for as pressure has been generally believed to be
the sole cause of corns, it is necessary for me, in
the course of the present treatise, to draw attention
to the structure of the epidermis, and also to the
tissue, which, lying under the epidermis, is so
immediately connected with it, so materially
influencing its condition, both in its healthy and
its unhealthy state.
The epidermis, if lost, is speedily restored ; a
scale of thickness is rapidly formed ; but its absence,
as I have had occasion to mention, may become a

source of serious mischief when raised from the sub-
jacent tissue, as is done by vesication. We find it

transparent, composed of vascular fibre, and in most
instances abounding with lines. Whether actual
foramina exist, through which the sensible and

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 11

insensible perspiration pass, has been the subject of

some doubt. It has been asserted that it is trans-
mitted under the scales, which are of exceeding

minuteness. Immediately under this scurf, skin, or

epidermis, is a tissue, to which the term, from its net-
like appearance, of rete mucosum has been generally

applied. It appears to be the termination of in-
numerable capillary vessels, which secrete a mucus

of singular character. This is the seat of the pig-
ment which gives the colour to the varieties of the

human race. To this the European owes his
redness, the Chinese his tawny hue, and the negro
his blackness. A portion of this mucus lubricates
the upper surface of the cutis vera, and another the
inferior surface of the epidermis. It is, generally

speaking, of nearly the same thickness as the epi-
dermis, but varies in different parts of the foot.

It is in this tissue that, I believe, may be found

the first cause of corns, and it is to the inspis-
sation of the secreted mucus, as I shall have

12 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

occasion to show, that the existence of these
annoyances is owing. Under this layer lies the
cutis vera, or true skin ; it has been considered
as a tissue formed of the immediate termination
of the nerves and vessels which ramify over its
surface. It is the source of sensibility and the
seat of touch, and by it sensation is conveyed to
the cerebral and medullary masses. It appears,
too, to be endowed with the power of imbibition,
for any substance may have its peculiar properties
conveyed with extraordinary rapidity to the brain,
the lungs, the heart, or to the secretions of the
body ; hence it is that substances rubbed on the
skin transmit their power to the stomach, for on
the removal of the epidermis and the application
of medicinal substances to the subcutaneous tissue
we can produce sleep, act upon the bowels, cause
vomiting, or give tone and strength to the general
system.
It has been erroneously asserted that pressure

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 13

upon the epidermis is the sole cause of corns ; that
its vessels, becoming injured and hypertrophied,

throw out a larger quantity of lymph than is neces-
sary ; and that the consequence is the generation

of layers, which become interwoven. Were pressure
the sole cause of corns they would not be confined
to so small a surface, they would necessarily embrace
a much larger portion of the foot, and we should find
the heel, where the greatest pressure exists, the most
frequent seat of disease. Some persons are annoyed
in a most extraordinary degree by corns, who are
the most careful in the selection of their shoes,
whilst many who are in the habit of wearing such
tight shoes as to be almost incapable of walking,

and who seem to wish to resemble, in their inca-
pacity for movement, the Chinese ladies, are totally

free from them ; besides which, infants have been
known to have striking excrescences. There is no

doubt whatever that the pain and uneasiness attend-
ant upon a corn are exacerbated by the pressure of

E

14 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

a tight shoe, and that instantaneous relief attends a
change ; but this is easily explained. A new boot

sometimes is said to have been the cause of the mis-
chief, whereas the corn has not only long existed, but

has formed for itself, in boots that have been worn,
a cavity. We constantly find that those who live in
towns are more subject to corns than those who live
in the country, although the materials ofwhich their
boots and shoes are made are so much harder and
rougher. It is not at all an uncommon thing for a

person who has been afflicted with serious excres-
cences to lose them altogether whilst in the country,

and again to be burthened with them on his return
to London. The alteration of structure, wherever
corns exist, is of the most decided character. No
longer can it be considered as organized texture, for
the laws of vitality have altogether ceased within its
immediate range ; vessels no longer circulate through
it their normal fluid ; nor does the rete mucosum
furnish longer that mild lymph which lubricates the

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 15

superior surface of the cutis vera, and the inferior sur-
face of the epidermis, but in its place there is an exu-
dation of a serous- like fluid, which rapidly hardens

and thickens, layer accumulates upon layer, a corne-
ous substance is formed, which gradually insinuates

itself either amongst the muscular fibre, or the
minute arterial vessels enter into the softer and
spongier parts, assist in giving here and there
vitality, and become the source of that exquisite
pain which is often complained of by the sufferer.
Corns thus developed are more generally difficult
of cure, and require all the skill and care which can
only be acquired by practice ; and he only should
venture upon any attempt to cure them, who from
long experience is capable of judging by the eye of
the exact nature of the difficulties he has to contend
with.

That injury done to a portion of the rete mu-
cosum causes the pouring forth of an additional

quantity of its secretion ; and alteration of its cha-

16 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

racter, from the inflammation produced, may be
shown from the singularly aggregated form in
which the corn appears. It is almost always in
layers, and it radiates from a centre, this point
having a larger number of laminæ than any other
portion ; at first the appearance is simply of hardened
pellucid mucus, but gradually different colours are

not unfrequently assumed, according to the inspis-
sation of the secretion, and then of the attempt

made by the capillary arteries to inosculate ; it
becomes in the first instance yellow, exhibiting
different shades, from the slightest tinge to the
deepest hue, afterwards we observe it to be red
or brown, and then in the centre a decided
black, sometimes surrounded by a complete areola
of inflammation, such as may be seen in the
incipient chilblain. These changes sometimes
follow one another with singular rapidity, at
others they are slow, and there is but a very
gradual deposition ; this will in some measure

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 17

depend upon the pressure which the surface has
to bear, for upon a tight shoe being discontinued,
the inflammation of the rete mucosum being put
a stop to, there is no fresh addition of secretion,
but the moment it is resumed, fresh irritation is
set up, accumulation again goes forward, and
generally the longer has been the cessation of
excitement, the less is the mucous tissue able to
bear a new action, and the more rapidly does the
corn again increase. We shall find upon an
examination of a corn that it is a successive
aggregation of layers, the centre of which is
denser and harder than any other portion, and
although it may preserve for a longer period its

pearly appearance, it nevertheless is more con-
crete than any other portion of its surface.

The
reason which may be assigned for this is that
there is a greater degree of vitality surrounding

this point than at any other portion of the super-
ficies. As it is formed like , an inverted cone, it

F

18 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

is more immediately in connection with the or-
ganized portion, and more subject to the action

of the surrounding blood vessels. The greater
the distance from the point the less of organization
exists. The first development of a corn is hence

but little painful, and it is only when it has ac-
quired some extent that it becomes annoying. It

not unfrequently happens that although the corn
has acquired a considerable extent, it has been
unsuspected in its growth, for springing from
the lower part of the integument, and not from
the epidermis, as has been assumed, its approach

has been totally unforeseen, and its first announce-
ment has been pain and suffering. It is this

which renders an occasional examination of the
feet by a Chiropodist absolutely necessary to
those who, being predisposed to these inflictions,
are liable to have them produced by some exciting
cause which has escaped the general observation.
In thus stating that we must well weigh the

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 19

cause,
anatomy and the physiology of the cuticular system
before we ascribe pressure as the proximate cause
of the disease, I have no hesitation in stating that
it is frequently the predisposing and the exciting
and that it is our bounden duty to instil
into the minds of those who wish to enjoy the
happy privilege of walking free from uneasiness,
the absolute necessity there is of giving full play
to the muscles of the foot, and fair and proper
opportunity for the skin to exhale the perspiration
which is naturally poured forth. Tight shoes
produce innumerable mischiefs ; it is not only the
hardening of a portion of the integuments which
result from their use, but the capillary circulation
is impeded, the muscular fibre cramped, and the
nerves kept in a state of irritation, which even
may produce a slight febrile condition of the
system. How often do we find ladies who have
taken but little exercise during the day, worn out
by fatigue, and in a high state of corporeal irri-

20 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

tation, from the heat of the foot and the sense
of tension over the ankle. Even maladies of striking
character have arisen out of this cause ; and though
the same fearful train of evils may not arise from
tight boots, as we find from the confinement of
the waist by bad stays, yet many are the afflictions
which the observant physiologist has known to
spring from the anxious desire that arises in the
female mind to possess that which from an early
period has been looked upon as an attribute of
beauty-the small foot. It is not for me to discuss
the dangers that arise from any impediment to
the capillary circulation, or to show how wrong
it is to cause a venous retardation in any part
of the system : that I must leave to those who
have taken under their own immediate consideration
the health of the community, sufficient must it
be for me to express my conviction that during
the exercise of my profession I have been witness
to deviations from the usual state of health pro-

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 21

duced by the tightness of shoes and of boots ;
and where I have been called upon in the higher
circles of society to relieve by my own treatment the
local sufferings, I have occasionally seen the necessity
of placing my patient under medical treatment for
constitutional maladies, which would not have
existed had the feet been allowed to enjoy the
functions for which they were destined by the
hand that so wondrously has formed them.
The matchless forms of sculptured beauty which
the destroying hand of time has left us in the
works of the mighty masters of the classic time,
exhibit to us the finest specimens of what the
foot would be, if allowed its free and uninterrupted
action. We are immediately struck with the
admirable manner in which it is organized, both
for the support of the frame and for motion ; its
flexibility, its power of action, its form, seem all
to have been the result of the examination of the
most perfect human models. We see that there

G

22 DISEASES OF THE FEET .

have been no artificial coverings, no compression,
no restraint ; that the gait must have been free,
firm , and elastic ; that the natural and healthful
action of every muscle, tendon, joint, and bone,
was fully studied and expressed. There is no
stiffness, no contraction of the heel, or the sole
of the foot ; to the toes are given their proper
functions ; we see that only the sandal has been
worn merely to cover and protect the integument
under the broad and expanded foot ; there have
been no ligatures, no unyielding bandages, no
cramping compresses, all is alike free, healthful,
natural. We well can comprehend on examining
them how the Macedonian phalanx or the Roman
Legion performed its long day's march.

We can
see how the ten thousand Greeks pursued their
daily wearying course through the destroying
climate of Asia, marching firmly, manfully, alike
across the arid sand, the mountain pass, or the
flinty plain. We almost are led to the wish to

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 23
see the European soldier similarly prepared
for his toilsome march. Unencumbered with the
unyielding shoe, which sometimes becomes in the
day a source of greater annoyance than of comfort
to him, he would be enabled to undertake fatigue

and privations for which he is now totally unpre-
pared. He would find an elastic tread, a firm

command over his muscular system follow upon
such a plan. He would be capable of making
a charge upon the enemy with greater steadiness,
and enabled to bear the shock which he is now
less capable of resisting. In this respect we
should do well to imitate the native soldier of

India, who under the English banner has fol-
lowed a Clive, a Hastings, or a Keane, when

the British soldier has almost sunk from the
insuperable difficulties which attend wearing all
parts of the dress he has been accustomed to
do in England, forgetful of the climate in which
he is placed.

24 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

It is not for me to enter upon the shape and
form of the foot and ankle, but the proper
development of the latter in early life is much
dependent upon the care and attention paid to
the toes, on whose surface the presence of corns
is a certain cause of alteration of the general
appearance of the lower extremity. The toes
are seldom objects of much attention to us. We

are too often contented with the common atten-
tion to cleanliness, and to the length of the nails ;

all other circumstances pass unheeded by, until
our thoughts are compelled to be directed towards
them in consequence of feeling some sudden
annoyance or actual pain. Such, indeed, is the
carelessness with which the subject is considered,

that the slightest allusion in society to these im-
portant parts of the human economy is considered

by many highly indelicate ; and even the subject of
corns is discussed with such a species of reserve and
mystery as to be almost absurd. A well-instructed

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 25

young lady would shrink back with horror at any
mention made of the natural perspiration of the
toes, yet of what importance it is to health ! and,
when checked, to what diseases does it give birth !
We may trace one half of the consumptions of
this country to cold suddenly applied to the feet,
by which the sensible exhalation is checked ; and
it is not sufficiently impressed upon the mind
that when once the regular perspiration from the
feet is checked, that it is a matter of the utmost
difficulty to restore it. The nightly foot-bath or
pediluvium is in vain had recourse to, although the
natural instinct of the human mind has shown that
this is the best remedy, the reasons for which it is
required are overlooked, and the simple warmth it
produces is thought to be all that is required.
But the experienced Chiropodist can confirm his
medical brethren, who ought to be aware that, if the
toes do not freely perspire, and even give out an
effluvium, some transpiring tissue must take up

H

26 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

the excretory duty. The skin is sometimes the
auxiliary ; sometimes disease is transmitted to it,
and those forms of cutaneous affection which
baffle the most skilful arise ; at others the lungs
are called upon to exhale more than in an
healthy state they naturally do ; and hence spring
up a varied host of maladies which owe their
origin to inattention to the humbler parts, as
they are considered, of the human frame-the
toes-but which, in fact, are as important
members of the body corporate as are any of the
structures of more complicated organization.

6

The muscles upon which the motion of the

foot depend have been beautifully and con-
cisely given by Sir Charles Bell, in his valuable

manual, the Anatomy of the Human Body. ' No

words that I could make use of could more ade-
quately convey a precise knowledge of that which

dissection shows ; indeed, after looking into a vast
number of volumes which have issued from the

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 27

pen of the most skilful anatomists, both here and
abroad, I know nothing that could be more
intelligible even to the non-scientific reader. I
have, however, in the Appendix, made use of a
more brief description, from a treatise written by
me some time since.

The power the toes have of supporting the super-
incumbent weight of the human body, is in a

great measure dependent upon their anatomical
structure ; the smaller ones have each three bones,
the larger one, two ; upon these sometimes rests the

whole of the person. What can be more astonish-
ing than the powers of the most celebrated of our

danseuses -what evolutions -what movements do
they perform upon their toes. We have seen some
of them walk the whole length of the stage of

Her Majesty's Theatre upon the great toe, ba-
lancing the whole of the body with a precision

as marked as it is graceful. No faltering, no
hesitation, but an onward progress is made upon

28 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

tip-toe, the whole weight, power, force, and strength

of the frame concentrated as it were upon a dimi-
nutive bone. The continual pressure does not

derange a single fibre ; whilst we are gazing at
the steadiness with which the position is maintained,
a sudden pirouette is made, the whole of the body
rotates upon the toe, we are enchanted with the
matchless grace displayed, we are loud in our
expressions of admiration of the wondrous art of

the accomplished dancer, but we forget the mar-
vellous fabric which admits of this extraordinary

performance. We may think of the long hours
which have been devoted to the acquisition of these
powers, we may shower our garlands upon the
artist, but we must not altogether forget the hand
which made the small organ, upon whose strength
so much depends. Our own daily and ordinary
motion would be a subject of much surprise and
admiration were we to see it made by the hand
of the mechanic, and any one who could imitate

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 29

it would be rewarded for his skill and his ingenuity.
As we walk the toes are called into action, we
throw the whole weight of our body upon them,
especially the great toe ; at every step we elevate
ourselves upon them alternately with the heel, and

bring the centre of gravity of the body perpendi-
cular to the advancing foot thus progressing onwards,

preserving a concave state of the sole, and keeping
the body in that upright position which is the glory
of man, and in which he has been taught that he
bears a resemblance to him who formed him.

The deformities that arise are generally the con-
sequence of inattention ; distortions, malformations,

however, present themselves, which cannot now
be the subject of consideration.
The lower extremities are with us destined to
be confined in leathern cases, sometimes from the
knees to the toes ; these are made without much
regard to the different structure of individuals, all
that the most intelligent of the shoemakers of

I

30 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

the day think of is the length and breadth of
the foot ; some of them, it is true, make a last
not from the foot but from the boot, instead of
modelling the foot, and fromthence making the
shoe. To this idea we are so much accustomed
that we too often buy what we require in the
most indiscriminate manner ; we go into the first
shoe shop that presents itself to our view, and
purchase a ready- made pair of shoes, quite satisfied
if they are long enough and do not pinch at the
sides ; the flexibility of the material is little thought
of, and still less is any attention paid to the natural
form of each foot, for what fits one is supposed to
be equally well adapted to all. This is, however,
a fearful mistake, for which a thoughtless person
has often to undergo great inconvenience, painful
annoyance, and even temporary lameness.
great desideratum is to leave the foot to its natural
action, to incumber it as little as possible, and not

to place it in immediate contact with hard unyield-
The

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 31

ing materials ; and, should there be any defects,
to have them carefully remedied, or the best means
taken to obviate them. If there is a predisposition
to corns, there should be more particular attention
directed to their position and the circumstances
under which they have occurred ; hence much
suffering may be prevented, and personal comfort
enjoyed. To inclose in a leathern prison a tender

and delicate foot, is to commit such an act of self-
infliction that we are persuaded that, when the

mischiefs which result from it are pointed out,
few will be so careless or thoughtless as to encounter
them, and whatever the dictates of fashion may be,
they will be abandoned should they lead to deformity
and to pain. It is true that the compression which
was formerly the fashion has been mitigated, and
young men are no longer employed for half an
hour in struggling to pull on a boot in which
they were for days to be tortured until the
foot was accustomed to its anguish. Still,

32 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

however, there is much room for improvement,
and much cause for reprobation of the practices
even of the present day.

The flexibility of leather is altogether over-
looked by those to whose management the

manufacture is committed, indeed there is
no attention ever paid to the subject ; on the
contrary, the shoemaker speaks of the durability
and of the lasting quality of the article he
wishes to recommend. However much pliability
would be advantageous, his attention is directed
to its capability of resisting external agents ;
he thinks nothing of the foot which is to be
cased within it ; flexible shoes are, therefore,
not to be expected. I should be most happy
to have the power of impressing upon the

minds of those most interested in the consi-
deration of these matters the absolute necessity

of remembering that it is not only the making
shoes waterproof that is the duty of the leather

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 33
maker, but that there are points of infinitely
more value. The wrinkles and the indentations
which habit makes in an old pair of shoes
ought to be some guide ; they show what have
been the movements of the foot ; they point
out the attempts which have been made by the
foot to accommodate itself ; and therefore they
ought to be studied by every one anxious to render
his workmanship of value. The deep furrows in
an old pair of boots are indications not to be
neglected, they ought to be examined as well as

the marks, wrinkles, and furrows of the coun-
tenance are by the physiognomist. The water-
proof boots, now so universally prevalent, are to

be viewed with much doubt and suspicion, for

although they in many instances do what they pro-
fess-withstand the influence of the rain, the dew,

and the mud-yet they become stiff and hard, and
often after a day's exercise are so uncomfortable,
that their being impervious is a matter of little

K

34 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

importance. They condense, too, the perspiration
on the feet, which are often surrounded by a damp
moisture that is highly injurious. The stockings
often exhibit the effects ; a yellow tinge is given
to them ; they are covered with a disagreeable dew,
and look as if they had been dipped in some
oleaginous fluid. When the boots are taken off
they seem pertinaciously to adhere to the foot, and
occasionally an odour is exhaled which is by no
means satisfactory to the olfactory nerves. This
kind of leather becomes additionally uncomfortable,
in every sense of the word, by being placed before
the fire ; and if, after a day's exposure to the wet

and moistness of the atmosphere, the wearer un-
consciously places his foot upon the fender before

a moderate fire , a disagreeable odour is emitted, the

foot becomes stiff, and on examination the follow-
ing morning it is found to have become exceed-
ingly harsh and rough in some places, whilst cracks

have occurred in the natural bends. Under such

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 35

circumstances probably a few hours will develop a
corn that has long been concealed, for a few hours'
wear of a pair of modern boots will be sufficient,
from similar causes, to produce excrescences quite
sufficient to induce repentance, and to enforce a
determination to find out another species of covering

in preference to that which has been thus injudi-
ciously used. It is true that sometimes the supplest

leather may not be devoid of its disadvantages
that it wears more rapidly ; still, however, it is
the bounden duty of every individual closely to
examine the materials of which the covering for
his feet are composed, and, if possible, to obtain
only those that are very soft and pliable.
The three tunics which cover the body having
been thus described, and the attempt made to
show the nature and proximate cause of the corn,

our next object is to ascertain what is the im-
mediate cause of the pain which, sometimes alto-
gether dormant, at length awakens attention, and

36 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

leads the invalid to seek some relief to sufferings
which increase not as the integuments appear to
be more or less involved, but under circumstances
which do not at all times seem explicable. We
have reason to know that fibrillæ, or threads of
nerves, inosculate over the whole foot, and anatomy
teaches us that each minute artery is itself fed
by arteries still more minute, so minute indeed as

to escape the eye, and only to be rendered cog-
nizable by the injections which are thrown into

the vascular system, and which then exhibit how
fearfully and wonderfully we are framed. That
great master of our art, Haller, laid it down as
a decisive doctrine, that irritability is the property
of muscular fibre, sensibility that of the nervous ;
it is, however, next to impossible to cut off the
connexion between the two, for minute nervous
fibrillæ intertwine with every muscular fibre, so
that the utmost art of dissection could not separate
them, and it may be imagined that the nerves

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 37
form so intimate a union with the muscular fibre
that they almost form an integral portion of it,
certain it is that the smallest injury inflicted upon
the muscular fibre will be felt, and if I may so
say, expressed by the nerve in the sensation of
pain. Minute as is the injury which is done to

the system by the corn, however healthy the con-
dition of the general system may be, it becomes

the source of pain the instant a nervous fibrilla
is touched. During the first access of the corn
there is little or no suffering, because the rete
mucosum, attempting to defend the cutis vera from
injury, increases the quantity and quality of its
secretion, and this for a time shields the nerves ;
but no sooner is the superincumbent weight greater

than can be borne than pain is felt, with its con-
sequences, the sympathy of the rest of the system ;

when follows a train of alterations which may be
said at least fully to develop the nature of the
corn. It is the cutis vera where the nervous

L

38 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

fibrilla is acted upon, but the rete mucosum and
the epidermis become the apparent disease. It
is thus in dropsy, the accumulation of water
is not the disease, but that alteration in the
termination of arteries or of veins by which
the fluid is deposited ; and he who believes
that by the
more than

evacuation of the fluid he does
afford relief to the system, errs
both in his reasoning and in his practice.
The vegetable physiologist finds a singular
similarity in the development of the external
coverings of the plant to that which occurs in
the animal kingdom. He finds an epidermis,
a cellular tissue, and an inner covering ; and
there are certain diseases to which plants are
liable which bear a close resemblance to those
which affect the human subject. It is not
essential for me to enter upon this inquiry,
but it would throw considerable light upon
many points now buried in darkness, but

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 39
which some of the French and German

physiologists have slightly attempted to elu-
cidate.

The morbid changes which may take place where
any of the nerves are wounded, have scarcely been
adverted to by any of those who have had the
best opportunities of witnessing them, and much
surprise would be excited were they to be arranged
and classified . It would be clearly shown that
the most alarming of them, even to convulsions,
lock-jaw, and death, have followed upon the injury
which has been sustained by a neglected corn or
an injudicious attempt to remove it. I shall have
occasion to speak of such events, but I should
have been glad if some surgeon had prepared my
way by showing to the Profession how regularly
spring up, one after the other, a fearful train of
symptoms, when an injury, apparently of little
consequence, excites the sensibility of the nerve
and the irritability of the muscle in a great

40 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

degree ; life cannot sustain an injury to the system
without a struggle, which gives rise to phenomena
that require deeper investigation than has been
bestowed upon them even by those who most have
thought.

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 41

CHAPTER II.

No term could be more expressive than the
one used by the Romans to designate a corn,
and medical authors have very judiciously
employed it, for it signifies a small tack driven

through the skin, and nothing could more com-
pletely answer the description ; spina pedum,

or the thorn of the foot, which has been
occasionally used, is by no means so expressive

of its appearance. A thickening of the epi-
dermis is the first apparent source of the corn,

I, however, believe that the original seat of the
disease is in a nerve under the rete mucosum, or
some part of the net-work ; this, from some cause

M

42 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

an

not thoroughly understood, becoming inflamed,
pours out increased quantity of secretion,

which gradually coagulates and at last in-
durates ; the under surface of the epidermis,

partaking of the inflammatory action, pours
forth its lymph for self- protection, and gradually
а mass of inorganic matter is formed, the

pressure of which upon the cutis vera is pro-
ductive of pain. It has been usual to give

the name of root to the inferior portion of
this callosity, and hence has arisen the most

incorrect theories and corresponding false treat-
ment of corns. For, thinking of the caudex

descendens of the vegetable kingdom, those
who have been in the habit of attending these
diseases, have thought that, by cutting out the
hard surface, they were actually putting a stop to
the means by which the growth of the substance
was fostered. Nothing can be more erroneous than
such a doctrine, and nothing more ridiculous than

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 43

the often-repeated statement of the thoughtless
operator, that he has completely eradicated corns,
that they will never reappear, because the callus
has been cut out. This absurd belief has in many
instances led to the great disappointment of the
sufferer, and has too often been the cause of the
disrepute into which Chiropodists have fallen who
have suffered themselves to be deceived by a

confusion of ideas, arising out of a foolish employ-
ment of terms.

When natural philosophers began to system-
atize and divide the animal, vegetable, and

mineral kingdoms into classes, genera, and species,
the medical professors in the different schools of

Europe followed their example in the arrange-
ment of disease, and Cullen led the way to a

nosological classification, which has become fami-
liar to all the students of medicine, and it has

been the aim of those who have wished to com-
bine simplicity with facility of comprehension, to

44 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

bring together the diseases of organs into such a
system as to enable every one to understand it, and
to add his own experience to that of those who

have already been practically engaged on the sub-
ject. It has been proposed to divide the classes

of indurations of the integuments of the feet
into two genera or families. Corns, or clavi pedum,
and callositates ; the first genus embracing four
species-clavus durus, or hard corn ; clavus mollis,
or soft corn ; clavus sanguineus, or bleeding corn ;
and clavus niger, or black corn ; and the second

genus comprehending two states-callositas super-
ficialis, or superficial callosity ; and callositas

repens, or burrowing callosity. These again
may be subdivided into varieties, which it
would now be useless minutely to examine.
This arrangement is certainly not objectionable,
and there is no man who has devoted his attention
to the cure of these maladies who has not seen
numerous examples of these different forms ; and

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 45

though long experience might enable me to point
out some additions to this view, I cannot object
to receive it as one from which much practical

utility may be deduced, and I can have no ob-
jection to add my own experience to that of men

who have preceded me in the field of my inquiry,
yielding to none of them in the anxious wish which
I entertain of adding my own stock of information
to that of my fellow labourers in the vineyard. The
clavus durus, or hard corn, is that which is most
commonly known, and it would be a work of
supererogation for me to descant upon that which
is familiar to most persons ; it however is more or
less troublesome, according to the locality in which
it is fixed, and is developed with more or less
pain, which is usually dependent upon the depth
to what is called its root penetrates, it sometimes
involves the synovial capsule of the joint, or even
descends to the investing membrane of the bone,
the periosteum, but the degree of pain is not

N

46 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

always an indication of the actual state of the

stem, whether it be single or many-forked, whe-
ther it be flattened or pointed, whether it be horny

or soft, the eye of the experienced practitioner
can alone detect these variations by the external
appearance.
The clavus mollis, or soft corn, is of a somewhat
different texture from the hard corn, and this
arises generally from its position, for it is most
frequently found either between the toes or close
to the nails, where the rete mucosum is less strongly
developed, and where also there is less opportunity
for the exudation upon whose coagulation and
concretion the hard corn generally depends.
Probably the first suspicion is awakened of the
presence of a soft corn by the sensation which is
felt of an extraneous body between the toes, and
the idea that first presents itself is that a small
piece of gravel or dirt has insinuated itself under
the stocking ; but symptoms of a more marked

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 47

character soon occur, and the sufferer gradually
finds himself a martyr to an affection which at
first appears too trifling to be noticed. He soon,
however, feels that he has no dormant enemy to
contend with, and is compelled, from the sufferings
he endures, to have recourse to proper skill for relief;
and indeed, should he be tempted, as sometimes
has been the case, to remove his tormentor by
excision, he produces a state of inflammation
and of acute suffering, as will sometimes for a
considerable time baffle remedial agency, and has
been known to produce such urgent symptoms
as to excite fears of a fatal termination. From
all that has been collected on the subject, it
would seem that ladies are much more prone to
this species of attack than men, and of course

various reasons have been assigned, and to nar-
row-soled shoes has been ascribed the frequency

of their suffering from this cause ; but it in
some degree seems connected with profuse perspi-

48 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

ration from the feet ; and those who are subject
to this species of corn have been remarkable
for the large quantity of secretion from the
pores of the skin, more especially in the immediate
neighbourhood of the part affected, but whether
this be cause or effect I will not attempt to
determine, sufficient is it for me to point out

the fact as one that has been observed. A super-
ficial corn is often to be noticed at the root

of the nail, which, like the preceding species,
is a source of much annoyance, though it is
not SO liable to produce the same intense
agony, unless it takes possession of the little
toe, when, from its greater liability to be
pressed upon, it often wears an aggravated
form, and is a source of much excitement.
Were I to point out the various seats of the
soft corn, I should be compelled to exceed the

limits to which I must necessarily confine my-
self ; it is enough for me to point out those

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 49

which are of most frequent occurrence.

They
all run much about the same course, sometimes
causing suppuration, and often attended with so
high a degree of irritation as to prevent an
individual from following his usual occupations,
and at any rate compelling him to abstain
from exercise, so that not unfrequently a series
of inconveniences follow upon the presence of
a minute induration, which is deemed by many
too trivial for the advice of a skilful man, and
is, therefore, too often neglected until suffering
brings repentance for the neglect.
The clavus niger is distinguished from the
clavus durus and the clavus mollis by the
appearance of a small black speck on the early
development of the corn. At first it is not

larger than the point of a pin ; it rapidly, how-
ever, enlarges, acquires a remarkable black hue,

is perfectly hard, and is difficult of extirpation.
A black coagulum of blood is generally found

50 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

at the base of this corn, which imparts to it
its peculiar hue. It is so imbedded in the cutis
vera, so surrounded by the papillæ of the nerves,
and so intimately connected with the minute
ramifications of the arterial system, that its
removal is attended with considerable danger ;
profuse hemorrhage has followed upon an attempt
at excision. This species of corn must not be
tampered with, for danger may present itself

even where least suspected. It should be care-
fully borne in mind that nothing but practical

experience can justify a man in attempting to
treat these maladies ; they are by no means so

simple as are imagined, and life may be en-
dangered by injudicious treatment. The fourth

species, or clavus sanguineus, demands still more
caution, for there is a predisposition to hemorrhage,
from which the name is derived. The excessive
vascularity of this corn has led some persons to
consider that it has differences sufficient to con-

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 51

stitute it a genus instead of a species ; but the
vessels which apparently supply it with blood,
and give the idea of its being organized, do
not enter into its substance, but are distributed

in such a way as to give rise to this suppo-
sition. This corn has usually, from its first

commencement, two or three peduncles separate
from each other, and in the interstices which

divide them blood vessels have so inosculated them-
selves as to form, with the peduncles, a congeries,

from which, upon the slightest cause, blood is

poured forth ; there are likewise intermingled ner-
vous filaments, which are productive of considerable

pain whilst the corn is attaining its full growth.
The blood is generally arterial, of a florid red colour
during the first development, but afterwards it
assumes a different character, is dark, and may
be supposed to have acquired the properties which
usually mark venous retardation . Both these last
species of corn are liable, in persons of a nervous

52 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

temperament, to produce considerable constitutional
irritation, and symptoms of extraordinary severity
are attendant upon improper treatment ; and not
only are local pain and uneasiness the consequence,
but there are many indications of general suffering,
owing to the sympathy which exists in many frames,
and the facility with which untoward consequences
follow upon the derangement of even a part of
the body which is unconnected with the great
organs by which the actions of life are carried on.

Such persons demand more than ordinary consi-
deration, and their disorders require more ten-
derness of treatment than we are usually called

upon to bestow.
Chemistry has been very properly called into
aid for the purpose of ascertaining the precise
nature of the substance of which the corn is
composed, as well with a view of preventing its
appearance as with an idea that light might be
thrown on its treatment, but little has been the

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 53

result. It is not found to differ much from that sort
of inorganic matter which is secreted in different
forms from the human body. The substance
has been subjected to aqueous, spirituous, and acid
maceration, but with little result. Sulphuric acid
exhibits no power upon it ; nitric acid softens it ;
the hydrochloric seems to have more influence,
but it does not act for a considerable length of

time ; some of the weaker vegetable acid pro-
duces a slight change, softening it.

Left for a
considerable time in cold water, little impression

is visible ; boiling water seems to loosen the ad-
hesion of the particles of which it is composed,

but altogether I may say that little or no light -
has been thrown upon the subject by the labour
of the eminent men who have thought that they
were useful to society by directing their minds to
points which many might not consider worthy
serious investigation. There is little doubt that,

whilst the corn is still attached to the surround-
Р

54

DISEASES
OF
THE
FEET
.

ing organic matter, it is more easily acted upon
by heat and by moisture than when removed,
and that therefore chemistry cannot furnish us
with many indications which may be of actual
service. We shall find that a corn which, when
the foot was immersed in warm water, was
rendered soft and somewhat gelatinous, will,
when removed by an operation, become of
excessive hardness, and resist the action of
boiling water. A corn of cartilaginous texture
in appearance has been softened by heat, and

apparently so penetrated by water that it has as-
sumed a totally different character, has been

unctuous, and almost mucilaginous.

Some vege-
table bodies, which in early spring abound with

hydrochloric acid, produce some slight influence
upon the substance of the corn, and hence have
been recommended by the humbler classes of

society as possessing curative powers. The exu-
dations from several of our indigenous plants

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 55
have been considered highly efficacious the

celandine, the lactuca virosa, the conium macu-
latum or hemlock, the milk thistle, have been

all used. The delphinium, or stavesacre, which
amongst the people is a favourite remedy for
all cuticular excrescences, certainly possesses
some slight effect, as do the ranunculuses
generally. Of these I may hereafter speak.
There is no part of the human foot in which
corns have not occasionally been found, both

the most delicate and the most hardened por-
tions of its integuments have been thus affected.

The soles of the feet, even in their thickest and
least sensitive part, have been studded with these
annoyances, but the little toe is generally found
to be their favourite position, a large portion of
it is frequently thus diseased ; the outer joint of
the great toe appears also to be more commonly

infested with these excrescences, under such cir-
cumstances are the more ordinary cases which

56 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

present themselves to the practitioner, and these

are the cases which give great annoyance, with-
out probably exciting that excruciating agony

which is felt when they appear on other places.
They are found under the nail of the great toe,
and then are the sources of much irritation ;
but there are other positions which they assume,
and which are sources of extreme misery to those
who suffer from them, for instance, the inner
portion of the little toe, close to the nail, has

been the fruitful cause of such a morbid con-
dition, that the whole frame has partaken of it,

and I have had occasion to relieve an apparently
broken-down constitution, by means so simple,
yet so efficacious, as to be looked upon rather as
a ministering angel than an ordinary observer of
the effects which may spring from the humblest

means. The roots of the nails have been occa-
sionally the seats of corns which have produced

a high degree of inflammation and tumefaction,

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 57

these have been ascribed to accidents, nay even
to a gouty diathesis, whilst the original cause
has been overlooked, because little or no pain
has attended their development. The three little
toes are indiscriminately diseased ; some persons
exhibit a peculiar idiosyncrasy in this respect,

and in families will be found a striking predis-
position to having this portion of the integuments

of the foot in an unhealthy state. The soles of
the feet, and the heels, often exhibit excrescences,
varying in the intensity of the symptoms they
display ; sometimes only those of annoyance, at
others of absolute pain. I should much extend

my work were I to enter minutely into the ap-
pearances which have presented themselves to me

during my extensive practice ; but I would observe
to the student that he must not be surprised at
the position and extent of some of the masses
which he will from time to time have occasion
to see ; he must bear in mind that the deviations

58 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

from the ordinary course of nature are not nu-
merous, but that from the facilities of witnessing

the varieties he possesses, he will see so many
as to lead to an impression that they are more
common than they really are.
The first idea which naturally presents itself to
those who are suffering from pain of any kind
is instantaneous relief, and many are most

willing to allow the " fons et origo mali " to re-
main, and again to be the fruitful offspring of

pain, rather than submit to any additional

suffering, even for the sake of altogether erad-
icating the exciting cause. Thus do we often

find a person suffering from the acutest agony
of the tooth-ache, who, when made aware of
the actual decay of the tooth, and the utter
impossibility of preventing a recurrence of the
agony, if it be at the moment relieved,
shrink from undergoing the only operation by
which he can be permanently restored to ease,

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 59

and seeking palliatives, which doubtless for a
time afford some cessation, but cannot altogether
put a stop to the disease. It is generally first
necessary, even in acute disorders, to examine
whether we possess means by which we can
alleviate the suffering, and sometimes gain
time, and give the system, which has suffered
from sympathy, time to recover. In the cure
of the disordered state of the feet we must
oftentimes
the means of palliation as well as to those of
cure, and we shall find that we often gain
reputation from the public, and estimation in
the eyes of our patients, from affording them
momentary ease as much as from the ultimate
cure of the disease. We are in most instances
precluded from administering many of those
remedies which the skill and knowledge of the
medical man enable him to avail himself of
in the more aggravated forms of disorders. We
devote as much consideration to

60 DISEASES OF THE FEET.
shall seldom find, unless indeed the case is
one of great urgency, that our patient is willing
to apply to those narcotics which affect the
general system, for the purpose of affording him
relief to a local malady, distant from any
important point. He who would submit
patiently to a dose of opium, of hemlock, of
belladonna, or of stramonium, for a tooth- ache or
for an ear-ache, would not be induced to try their
effects when the cause of his suffering was seated
in the foot, and thus are we deprived of the
assistance of some agents of considerable power
as palliatives ; on the other hand, the confidence
of the public is so much abused by a class
of self- educated and self-extolling practitioners,
who pretend to have discovered infallible means
of preventing diseases such as we have described,
that innumerable difficulties surround the subject.

Specifics for all the ills of life have been disco-
vered daily and hourly, if the public press is to

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 61

be taken as our guide, for not a sheet issues
from the press, but amongst the advertisements
will be found the bold assertion of some loud
proclaimer of his power, and more especially in

the department to which I have devoted my atten-
tion ; plaisters, ointments, liniments, lotions, are

all brought before the astonished world as pos-
sessing infallible power. The maker of these

nostrums wraps in becoming mystery his discovery,
he obtains a patent for it, he signs his own
autograph upon the stamp ; there is necromancy,
witchcraft, and marvellous power in everything
he propounds.
fail, according to his own assertion, and what
chance has he who has devoted his life to inquiry,
has honestly to confess that the deviations of nature
surpass his expectations, that her ways are often
inscrutable, and that all he can do is to study to
learn and to attempt to cure, without professing
that every malady is subjected to his superior skill.
He has never been known to

R

62 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

Most urgently do I recommend those who are
afflicted with corns, however harmless they may

seem , however easily removed, never to have re-
course to the knife. They may be assured that

though there may be a vast number of instances
in which no bad consequence has attended upon
this operation, yet there are so many and such
serious events which have arisen out of it, that no
one who has a regard for his own comfort and

safety should venture upon it. One sad termina-
tion outweighs a whole catalogue of fortunate ex-
tirpations. I strenuously recommend those who,

suffering from corns, are anxious for relief, never
to have recourse themselves to the penknife, to
the razor, or even to the scissars, but to place

themselves as early as possible under the manage-
ment of some one who has long been skilled in

their cure. They will find temporary and sometimes

permanent relief, if the affection be but com-
mencing, from plunging the foot in a hot pedi-

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 63

luvium, pouring in from time to time hot water,
and keeping it steadily immersed at least half
an hour. The foot should then assiduously be
rubbed for a considerable length of time with a

dry rough towel, the friction need not be con-
fined to the immediate surface of the corn, but

rather on the integument immediately in contact
with it. In the greater number of instances
this process will be followed by the loosening and
extraction of all the corneous substances ; there
will be neither pain nor uneasiness left ; the sleep

will be uninterrupted by any disagreeable sen-
sation, and though the corn may, and most

probably will, return, it may again be removed
in a similar manner, and should the exciting
cause be avoided, there is little doubt that an
ultimate cure may be obtained ; this, however,
is somewhat difficult, and it is too often found
that, after a short time, it occupies precisely the
same ground that it did before ; nor can it

64 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

altogether be extirpated but by the aid of an
experienced practitioner. As I have observed,
never should the apparently simple appearance
of a hard corn lead to the use of the knife
by the patient, for, although there may be
nothing from which any bad result could be
anticipated, no external characters which give

the least indication that evil will be the con-
sequence of a meddlesome practice, yet the

most serious consequences may result, and
when too late there will be cause for the
deepest regret. If I appear somewhat tedious

on this matter if I have been guilty of repe-
titions—I trust that I may be excused for an

earnestness and an anxiety on a subject which
I conceive of more importance almost than any
rules I may lay down. It is a maxim which
I would have a starling taught to repeat ; it
is a sentence which should be repeated in the
ears of every sufferer from corns ; it is a voice

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 65

which should be echoed back upon every occa-
sion-Do not use the knife to your corns !

If after such a warning there should be any
venturesome enough to neglect it, the danger

must be on their own heads ; but the repent-
ance will come too late.

I
am not fond of giving cases, for I am
sorry to find that every empiric who practises
any branch of the medical profession fancies
that the true avenue to employment is to narrate
extraordinary cases, whether they are founded on
truth or not, because he fancies that people will
see something in what they read which may
remind them of their own suffering ; but I cannot
pass over an opportunity of referring to what
occurred during my residence in Edinburgh,

and which could not fail to make a consider-
able impression upon the minds of the highly-
polished inhabitants of that city. The lady of one

of the most distinguished Professors there had a

S

66 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

corn between the toes, which had been the source
of much suffering. She cut it with some sharp
instrument-blood followed ; after this she went

into society, and for some days had apparently for-
gotten the circumstance, when violent pain came

on. She preferred sending for her own surgeon,
who is one of the most distinguished professors of

surgery in Scotland, but he unfortunately consi-
dered such an ailment too trivial for his consider-
ation ; he passed a sharp instrument, and death

was the almost immediate result. This was attri-
buted to the mortification which it was said had

been slowly advancing from the moment of her
attempt to cut it. I was fortunate enough, at
the same time, to be in attendance upon the
lady of a distinguished physician residing in
Abercrombie place, who had also been rash enough
to use the penknife, and to produce mischief for

which she anxiously sought my advice in conse-
quence of the former case, and I was eminently

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 67
successful. I will only allude to the case referred to
in the memoirs of the Duchess d'Abrantes ; it will
be seen in the second volume. I could refer to

a vast number of examples, if I thought it neces-
sary to add to the testimony which I here bear

to the sad results of using the knife.
The most appalling spasms, convulsions terrible
even to behold, and lock-jaw, have attended on
the wounding a branch of a nerve by a common
penknife, hæmorrhage scarcely to be arrested. The

two species I have described under the designa-
tion of clavus niger and of clavus sanguineus, least

admit of being tampered with ; let the appliances
be what they may, let the skill be great, still no

blood is to be produced from them, until the con-
stitution has been duly prepared, until every ad-
vantageous circumstance presents itself. It is not

difficult for any person who is determined to

acquire the art to enable himself by the assist-
ance of a proper instructor to eradicate corns ;

68 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

but, like every other species of knowledge, it is
to be gained by diligent practice. It is, however,
a considerable length of time before a person,
however assiduous he may be, is fitted for all
the anomalies which present themselves. In
attempting to describe the plan to be pursued, I

am aware how difficult it is ; but there are cer-
tain hints which I would throw out for the

guidance of those who would commence the
manual operations in which I have been for a
series of years engaged, and to perform which,
with dexterity and success, has demanded on my
part considerable labour, observation, and anxiety.
No one, however fortunate he may have been
in acquiring the confidence of the public, can
altogether divest himself of anxious fears when
about to commence any operation on which the
welfare of a fellow-being is dependent, and I can
conscientiously assert that I have at all times
exerted myself to the best of my ability to give

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 69

relief immediately, and that in recommending
the abstaining from any operation, it is from
a feeling that it would not be attended with
success. I have always attempted to maintain
self- possession and calmness during the whole
of a manipulation, whatever might present itself
of unexpected difficulty ; and I have been happy
enough to have escaped those dangers into which
others have fallen. My own plan, which I would

recommend to others, as best calculated to en-
sure success, is to place myself in such a position

near the window that the light may fall upon

my right hand. I prefer the broad clear day-
light, but of course am often compelled to accom-
modate myself to circumstances. Immediately on

a line with myself is placed my patient on an
ordinary chair, somewhat higher than my own ;
his left foot is placed upon my right knee, or his
right foot upon my left knee ; I am thus capable
of carefully examining the seat of the disorder.
T

70 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

Near me are placed, so as to be immediately
within my grasp, whatever I may require,
or the remedial agents of which I expect to

stand in need. I generally find some magni-
fying or microscopic glasses of great utility to

me, often enabling me to ascertain, with great
minuteness, objects which might otherwise escape
attention.
The removal of the corn is to be considered
the great object which the operator is to have
in view ; he is to detach from the subjacent tissue
every portion of the extraneous substance which lies
imbedded, and, as may well be imagined, in many
instances much time elapses before the different
stages into which the operation is divided are
concluded, and there must be occasionally such

shifting of the mutual positions of the Chiro-
podist and his patient, as may allow the former

every facility for carrying out his object ; but
each change should be slowly carried out, and

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 71

no hurry of any kind suffered to throw either

party into an uncomfortable position. It some-
times occurs that the elbow must rest upon

the patient's knee, and both parties must main-
tain their steadiness, otherwise a slip of the

instrument might occur, which might produce
some degree of inconvenience ; sometimes the

hand must be used where the very minute por-
tions of the indurated mass require to be re-
moved ; indeed it is sometimes better to avoid

the use of any instrument whilst the loosening
of the integument takes place ; but these are
minutiæ into which it may not be necessary
for me to enter, but which are to be acquired by

practice. It must be borne in mind that the mani-
pulation which is sufficient for one corn is not suffi-
cient for another, and that so many intermediate

varieties from complete adhesion up to slight
attachment exist, that it would be irrelevant to
describe each ; it must also be borne in mind that

72 DISEASES OF THE FEET.
occasionally there are shreds of indurated skin
which are not necessary to be cut, and which
would produce pain were they to be needlessly
meddled with. It would likewise be trespassing
too much on the time of my readers were I to
enter upon the positions necessary, and the exact

nature of the operation to be performed accord-
ing to the situation of the corn,

whether upon
the great toe, the little toe, or the sole of the

foot, each requires some little study to accom-
modate the operation to the state of the patient.

The paring away of the hard induration with-
out the dissection is sometimes necessary to be

effected before any attempt at taking out the roots,
and the operation may demand more attention,

especially if there be much tumefaction and ten-
derness present, although these symptoms, gene-
rally speaking, need not interfere with the

process for their relief. The most certain and
efficacious plan is to examine the condition of

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 73

the part on which the operator has been engaged
about a week after this sitting. He then is
enabled to form a judgment as to his complete
success ; he will see whether the vacancy that
has been made by the extirpation has been
filled up by a healthy process ; whether the

rete mucosum is again pouring forth a secre-
tion which will again indurate and prove a

nuisance to the unfortunate patient. Watching
the progress of the efforts made by nature for

the reproduction of parts that have been de-
stroyed is always one of the most interesting

occupations of the physiologist, who often enjoys
opportunities of studying a most important leaf
of the book of nature. The operation which is set
up under such circumstances, as well as those to

which I have directed attention, is one of con-
siderable importance, and demands the careful

observation of the Chiropodist, who is sometimes
U

74 DISEASES OF THE FEET.
called upon to hasten it, or at others to detach
unnecessary portions.
However skilful the manipulator may be, no
task can be more difficult than the description of
an operation, or the precise laws to be attended
to when it becomes necessary to have recourse to
instruments. It is only practical experience that
can be the guide, and it is only the well- accustomed
eye that knows the precise moment at which
such interference is necessary as may lead to
the ultimate well-doing of the patient. A long
series of years, a vast number of cases, must
found the groundwork on which both theory
and practice must rest. In vain will the most

accurate language convey the ideas of the ob-
servant man if, besides that, there is not the

tact and judgment which are only to be acquired
by having the attention constantly fixed on a
subject, and the readiness which can only be

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 75
attendant upon habit. It is a well-known fact
that everybody fancies he is equal to the cutting

his own corns, notwithstanding the numerous in-
stances in which the most disastrous events have

followed upon this self- confidence, and there is
no man, however ignorant he may be, who
does not indulge in the flattering idea that he
has only to announce himself to be a Chiropodist
to be at once gifted with the knowledge of an
intricate art, and to be capable of exercising it
not only with perfect safety but with certain
success. A few fortunate trials, where there has
happened to be only the common-place and
ordinary affections, give him the sanguine hope
that he has at length found out the avenue to
fortune, and boldly does he proceed in his

path, until he is suddenly arrested in his on-
ward career by some unexpected difficulty. In

an unadvised moment, elated with his sudden
good fortune, he has carelessly plunged his knife

76 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

into one of those apparently unorganized corns in

which, unfortunately for him, are numerous rami-
fications of minute arteries, somewhat more deeply

seated than he in his philosophy had dreamt
of: a sudden hæmorrhage occurs, he is astonished
at the unforeseen catastrophe ; he finds, on a more
minute inspection of the excrescence which he has
so unceremoniously incised, that the tumuor is more
circumscribed than he has been in the habit of
witnessing ; that it has a more spongy substance ;
that here and there red specks may be traced ;
both the operator and the patient have reason to
congratulate themselves if the only symptoms that

follow are painful tumefaction and high constitu-
tional irritation, for fatal events have often sprung

from such attempts. I will not attempt to paint

some of the scenes which have presented them-
selves to me. I will confine myself to holding

forth a solemn warning to those who, with
matchless effrontery and shamefaced daring, at-

DISEASES OF THE FEET.

4477
tempt to enter upon the practice of an art
which demands caution, prudence, and above all

serious reflection, before it is attempted to be fol-
lowed. There can be no objection to reasoning

based upon experiment, but an unfortunate patient

is not to be made the means of acquiring infor-
mation. He who attempts to relieve others

should have studied under the guidance of one
who has already attained knowledge, and there

can be no earthly excuse for rashness and igno-
rance. It is not a scalpel or a knife that are to

be used, but there are instruments necessary for
different manipulations into a description of which I
cannot enter, because they are not to be thoroughly
understood without some examples of them, and
diagrams exhibiting the precise manner in which
they act. Each Chiropodist has his own favourite
instrument ; some excel in the use of one, whilst

another places confidence in one of his own con-
struction. I have the firmest reliance on those

X

78 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

which I myself invented, to which long habit
has accustomed me, and I fearlessly assert that
they would be found by any one who is anxious
to acquire excellence in the art, the best that
have been invented. At the same time I am
most willing to do justice to others, who have

with great assiduity and labour brought to per-
fection manipulatory powers, in which they have

with justice perfect confidence. It is sometimes
necessary to be enabled to scrape the surface of
the corn,

to pass beneath it, to elevate it, to lay
hold of it, and extract it from the layers in

which it is imbedded ; all these different opera-
tions require their own peculiar instruments.

They are to be handled each in its own manner ;
the hand should therefore be dexterous, light, and
flexible, no stiffness of joint, no thickening of
the palm of the hand ; a quick eye and great
steadiness are demanded. There must be no
flurry, no haste, no exhibition of doubt or ap-

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 79

prehension ; calmness and coolness are necessary
to the perfection of practice. The operation once
commenced must be steadily persevered in, unless
cause exist to wait for a time, as is the case
if the least quantity of blood is poured forth ;
this should always prevent any further step, for
whilst it may be looked on as somewhat of an
unfavourable symptom, it precludes the possibility of
seeing what is to be done, or what has been already
effected. It has been my good fate, out of above
eighteen thousand cases, not to have three times
produced blood. It is possible in every case to avoid
the smallest bleeding, and it may be considered
an untoward event wherever it occurs. The skilful
operator avoids it ; he neither produces pain nor
bleeding, but carries on his work without injuring
any part with which he is compelled to come
into contact. All the ramifications of the corn
are to be diligently searched for ; there is to be
no superficial passing over any minute branch or

80 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

stem ; there is to be the greatest delicacy, ten-
derness, and gentleness in every attempt to

remove any of the means by which the adhe-
sion is affected. Should there be a suspicion

that these adhesions are deeper seated than
usual, it is generally proper to suspend for
some days any further proceedings : but to give
directions on this point is almost impossible, for
nothing but long experience can sufficiently
give the proper knowledge of what is to be
done ; caution, however, should always be the
safeguard of the practitioner and of his patient.

Both immediately before and after the opera-
tion others generally recommend the immersion

of the foot in hot water ; this measure generally
does great harm, especially to the tender foot,
the parts immediately around the corn swell and
inflame. I am no advocate for the employment
of any of those boasted remedies which have
been loudly praised as capable of acting upon

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 81

the induration, and of preparing it for dissec-
tion. I have no objection to friction with

flannel, but not with hard substances, which
many are extremely partial to ; amongst these
are the pumice stone, the scuttle fish, sand
paper, and even rough files . Considerable injury
has followed upon their indiscriminate use, and
although there may occasionally be circumstances
in which they may be properly employed, yet,
generally speaking, they do more mischief than
good. It is very difficult to confine their use
to the mere induration, and the surrounding
integuments are liable to be irritated by them.
Some balsams and tinctures have been much
spoken of by the older writers on the different

excrescences, but modern practice has very judi-
ciously excluded them from their insufficiency to

produce any good effect. The radical cure is
more dependent upon surgical than upon medical

means ; and although I should gladly avail my-
Y

82 DISEASES OF THE FEET.
self of any of the suggestions which have been
made from time to time for the relief of these
maladies, yet I have found no
place faith in any of them.

good reason to
Many are the
hints thrown out by our old herbalists in their
quaint language as to the powers of some of
our indigenous herbs, and certainly in one or

two instances their recommendations have ap-
parently had some slight success, but they are

better adapted for those slight cases which are
benefited by the removal of pressure than for
any of those more serious ones which are likely
to engage the attention of the practitioner.
Amongst the herbs of which they have boasted
there is one which certainly has some slight
influence upon corns, and is a great favourite
amongst the popular writers on corns-it is the
common house-leek, the sedum murale. This
herb, which is found growing on the tops of old
garden walls and upon the roofs of houses, has a

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 83

leaf of considerable thickness, owing to the large
quantity of cellular tissue between its upper and

lower lamina, in whose interstices is found con-
siderable juice, which abounds with hydrochloric

acid in a free and uncombined state, which may
easily be shown by means of nitrate of silver,
for it speedily enters into combination with the
silver, forming that which is commonly known
under the name horn of silver. Owing,
doubtless, to the presence of the acid, the juice
acts upon the indurated mass, softening and
destroying the surface, but leaving the lower
parts as great a source of mischief as ever,
and sometimes converting the corn into a more
hardened mass than it was before. Those who
have tried the remedy seem decidedly averse to
its repetition ; from my own experience I have
nothing to observe, having collected from others
what I have now said.
The great object in the sole of the shoe is

84 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

hardness, and the flatter and more even the
better. Many persons have most injudiciously
recommended that holes should be perforated in
cork soles and false bottoms, with a view of
giving room to the corn, and thus to prevent
pressure. To this To this I most decidedly object, for the
result is generally irritation and inflammation of
the surrounding integument, and a constant state of
indescribable annoyance. The sole of the shoe
should be made of one solid substance, and not of

three laminæ, as is generally the case ; for the inner-
most produces swelling and considerable uneasiness

of the surface, than which nothing is more hurtful.
Few people pay proper attention to these points,
and shoemakers follow their own inclination, and
generally tell their customers that a few days will
make the boot stretch and the foot will settle
down. When we reflect that many diseases in
the head are the consequences of the compressed
circulation in the foot, it is a matter of asto-

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 85

nishment that so little attention has been paid.
It has happened not unfrequently that a person
suffering from a corn in the sole of the foot, or
some soreness of the integument, has fancied
that relief was to be obtained by a soft lining
placed within the sole of his shoe, and has had
recourse to one of the cork soles covered with
lamb's wool which are sold in the shops. He
has worn it for two or three days, when, to his
inexpressible surprise as well as sorrow, he has
found not only darting pains across the footstep,
pain in the back of the great toe, but even that
disease which I am about to describe the

bunnion-has threatened him with all the afflic-
tion that attends upon it. "Incidit in Scyllam

cupiens vitare Charybdim, " he has expected to
avoid one mischief and has fallen into another

even worse to bear. Strenuously would I re-
commend, therefore, that no fancied relief from

soft, warm, yielding materials, should tempt him
Z

86 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

who suffers to try its effects ; he will bitterly
regret it, and then the advice which I have
offered may recur to his mind.

It is from my

own experience, moreover, that I offer my recom-
mendation, for others have given opinions the

reverse of mine, and those who have followed
them have uniformly told me that they have to

their sorrow found they were misled by misre-
presentations which sprung from theory, but were

not based on practice.
It not unfrequently happens that a person who
comes up to London, although much accustomed
to pedestrian exercise, has scarcely trod our
well-paved streets a week, before he discovers
that his change has at least been productive of
one unexpected annoyance ; he finds for the first
time that he had corns, to which he did not
dream that he had the slightest predisposition .
On the other hand, a person who has always
breathed the air of the great metropolis, who has

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 87

daily taken his walk from the West End to the
City, no small distance every day, on going
into the country finds in a few days that he
must abandon the luxury of walking, for he has
for the first time become subject to the painful
inconveniences of which he has heard so much,
but fortunately felt so little. Thus we find that

an alteration in the tread of the foot is a fre-
quent source of annoyance. The simple change

from a rough to a smooth surface ; or, on the

other hand, from the smooth to the rough, de-
mands an imperceptible difference in the motion

of the muscles and their integuments, and the
joints seem to attempt to relieve themselves, for
near them the rete mucosum commences that
series of action which is the first cause of the
induration of the integument. This may be
obviated by the use of a different shoe-a more
elastic one is demanded for the pavement than
for the hard road, for which a thicker material

88 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

is necessary. Amongst the subjects which have
been frequently discussed is the singular state of

corns just previous to wet weather. The com-
mon expression, " we are about to have damp

from the shooting of my corns, " has naturally
led to some remarks ; and there can be no
doubt whatever that different states of atmosphere
act upon the integuments of the human body.
Electricity has a wondrous influence both upon
body and mind, and in damp weather we are
constantly giving up the natural electricity of
the system. For such is the tendency to а
general equilibrium of caloric and of electricity,
that bodies are continually in a state of change,
either giving off or receiving them. One of
the learned physicians of the day has instilled
into the minds of the public the advantages of

wearing silk next the skin, for, as it is a non-
conductor of electricity, it keeps within the body

that which has been generated there. We shall

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 89

find that the lower extremities are remarkable for
the influence produced upon them by atmospheric
changes. Few things are more striking than the
appearance of the large sparks of electric fire
and the loud crack which occur when a silk
stocking is pulled off. In the dark the peculiar
blue light is singularly visible, —a long train of
fire seems to issue forth, and not unfrequently

this is attended with a peculiar tingling sensa-
tion. Persons of a nervous temperament more

particularly exhibit this phenomenon, delicate
females more especially ; and there seems to be
some connexion with maladies of the nervous
system generally. We find such persons more

than usually listless, given to yawning, and inca-
pable of following any pursuit with vigour.

They are liable to glandular swellings, and to
attacks of inflammation of the tonsils or throat,
showing what a sympathy exists in different parts
of the body. Many such are afflicted with
A A

90 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

painful corns, singular as such a fact may seem ;
every medical practitioner, upon looking over his
roll of patients, will find confirmation of it. But
the phenomena of disease are, as the inquirer into
that branch of philosophy acknowledges, connected
more or less with hygrometrical facts. In a
work to which we have elsewhere alluded, as
one from which most of the knowledge which
practitioners had of corns was derived, is a very
curious and at the same time a remarkably well
drawn up view of the effects of the atmosphere
upon the corn, exhibiting the influence of its
pressure upon the system generally, and upon
these small excrescences particularly.
weight of atmosphere upon the human body
is equal to two thousand two hundred and sixty
pounds, and therefore the pressure upon each
square inch amounts to nearly nineteen pounds ;
if we then take the proportion of the foot
upon which the weight of the atmosphere is more
The

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 91

or less increased, we shall find that there is

under certain circumstances such increased pres-
sure upon the integuments, that the subjacent

parts must feel the full force. To those who
have known what the simple exhaustion of a
small quantity of air in a cupping glass effects as
to the sensation of weight on the body, there
can be but little difficulty in comprehending what

changes may result from the weight of the atmos-
pheric air upon the corn, driving it into the

subjacent tissue with considerable force, such
even as to affect the minute capillary vessels,
and the small nervous fibrillæ, which exist to
such an extent over the greater part of the foot.
This is a question, however, into which I have
no inclination to enter ; sufficient is it, that those
who are tormented with corns should occasionally
be reminded of their presence, that they may
seek those means of relief which are afforded
them. I do not pretend to be enabled to account

92 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

philosophically for the effects of heat and cold
upon them, but to point out that it is necessary
to take some precautions as soon as they become
troublesome ; and that those who are negligent,
because there is no immediate bad symptom, may
suddenly, even from change of weather, be laid
up, and prevented from following their usual
avocations. Months, nay years, may sometimes
pass by, and trifling inconvenience only arise ;
but as age creeps on, as the system becomes less
capable of self-restoration after disease, as the
integuments become harder, so is there greater

difficulty in eradicating or curing these com-
plaints. The young should not allow them to

exist, for they will grow with their growth, and
will oftentimes impede them when most they
are anxious for activity and
who are advancing in life
memory that their defects are

exertion. Those
should bear in
soon aggravated,
that wounds are more difficult to heal, that the

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 93

renovating powers lose their vigour as time creeps
on, and therefore none should delay. They
will find that they are destined, like the rest
of the race of man, to some of those evils
which beset us ; fortunate indeed is it that they
are capable of being remedied ; and, as the
means lie within our grasp, they are not to be
neglected, but every effort made to combat
them, and thus pass our time in comfort and
ease, when so little may disturb our most
anxious searches after repose and tranquillity.
The summary of long experience in the
management of corns I would willingly give in
few words, but there are many points which

must be dwelt upon, for without sometimes ex-
patiating on them they are likely to be speedily

forgotten, but I should most strenuously impress

upon the minds of all that the earlier atten-
tion is paid to a corn the better ; the moment

it excites the attention it ought to be at-
BB

94 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

tended to by some experienced person, for to

what extent it may arrive without due atten-
tion it is difficult to say. If it is seated upon a

joint it ought not for a moment to be neglected,
for it is probable that it will soon become an
impediment to exercise of any kind, besides which
it is much more likely to return if it arrive at
a certain stage. When arrested in its progress in
its early stage it will most probably never again be

seen, but relapses are more likely to occur if situ-
ated there. Although cures are sometimes spon-
taneously produced, yet they are rare, and how-
ever complete may appear the cure, yet at a most

unexpected moment the corn may recur without
there being the slightest possibility of accounting for
it. In the meantime no pressure may have taken

place, no tight shoe worn, no exposure to vicissi-
tudes of heat or cold-nothing, in fact, that can

throw the least light upon the subject ; but to the
surprise of the sufferer a corn upon whose disap-

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 95

pearance he had congratulated himself, will not only
be visible, but it will resist more than the ordinary

means for its extirpation, and prove to be infi-
nitely more obstinate than he could have imagined.

Prompt attention is always demanded for those
corns which are either dark in the centre or have
any unusual colour, and more especially if these
appearances are exhibited on the first approach of
the enemy. They betoken that not only are the
integuments in an unnatural state, but that the
vascular and nervous system partakes of some
unusual condition. I have uniformly observed
that such cases neglected have been the most
difficult I have had to encounter, and that I
have had more uneasiness for the sake of my
patient than I could willingly submit to. I
also uniformly have found that corns between
the toes have been very troublesome, and that
the long interval of absence from pain is not
to lead to the idea that they are becoming

96 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

inert, and that they will remain so, for, sooner
or later, to the great distress of the person
who has to bear it, they will exhibit their real
character. Pain, swelling, fever, misery of no

ordinary description will arise, and will be dif-
ficult to subdue, without greater attention than

can under ordinary cirumstances be paid. These
are points which the superficial observer may be
likely to overlook, but which I am convinced
will be found of no small importance. If the
patients who have corns did but know that they
were their own enemies by their neglect of
having recourse to proper assistance, less serious
cases would present themselves, and half the
occupation of the Chiropodist would be lost ;
still I feel it my duty to impress upon the
minds of all tuto, cito, " if it were done,
would that it were done quickly. All these

things demand promptitude, and that must de-
pend upon the determination of the sufferer to

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 97
seek assistance as early as possible The most .
remarkable cases which I have seen, would have
been in their earlier stage of easy treatment,
but either neglect or a want of judgment has
rendered them difficult, and have demanded the
most sedulous care. If then I have been so
urgent upon these points, I must fall back
upon the experience which has taught me the
necessity of prompt and active measures to make

up for the slowness, the indolence, or the in-
attention of those whose duty it was to have

gone before me, and have rendered my inter-
ference altogether unnecessary.

There is no one who does not think himself
equal to give advice upon medical subjects. An
invalid always has a vast variety of friends who
have something or other to recommend which they
believe to be infallible, and as for corns, each
person has his own undoubted plan. I lately
read with much pleasure a work addressed to

C C

98 DISEASES OF THE FEET.
sportsmen, by Lieutenant- Colonel Hawker, entitled
' Instruction to Young Sportsmen in all that
relates to Guns and Shooting. ' He does not,
however, confine himself to the mere description
of the destructive instruments, but gives various
pieces of advice. Amongst these is one from
which I must most decidedly dissent, although his
work may be valuable to others, and his instructions

generally admired ; as this opinion is not unfre-
quently entertained, I have given the extract with

a view of recommending sufferers to avoid it .

" To walk with corns, and without torture,
" get a piece of chamois leather, spread with
"diachylon plaster. Cut with your wadding-
"punch as many rounds as will form a sufficient
" thickness to prevent the boot or shoe from
' pressing your stocking on the corn ; for the
"reception of which you must punch a small

"hole through the centre. By this simple con-
66

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 99

" trivance I have known many a dot-and- go-one
66
66
gentleman start off as bold as a dog just un-
' coupled.
" The following recipe was given me by the
" Earl of on purpose for this book ; and
"I set my man to try it on several unfortunates
"who have given him their blessing for the cures
" he has made.

"
Mercurial plaster
66
66

-
' Diachylon ditto, with resin
' Diachylon ditto

2 drachms
of each.
66 Sugar of lead - 20 grains.

66

" All mixed together
"And spread on leather.

Apply a piece of this plaster for three or
" four Then soak the foot ; and rub the days.
" corn with a piece of pumice- stone. Again

"repeat the plaster ; and the corn will soon dis-
66

appear. -N.B. The corn never to be cut. "

100 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

So far from being serviceable, although the relief

is temporary, and, as the author observes, a gen-
tleman may start off with apparent ease, yet upon

that very spot soon grows an extraneous lump
corresponding to the hole formed in the plaster ;
this is exceedingly difficult to get rid of, and
becomes painful in the extreme, the circulation
of the blood is checked by the surrounding leather,
and the nerve painfully pressed on. Even when
the corn is extracted this lump remains, so that
the wearer of the plaster becomes subject all his

life to a very distressing malady. Let me there-
fore recommend no chamois leather spread with

diachylon with a hole in the centre for the reception
of the corns-too late will the wearer find out the
disadvantage of not attending to my counsel.
That corns have disappeared where diseases of
an aggravated character have supervened is a
matter of little doubt, and attempts have been made
to explain the causes of this apparently singular

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 101

circumstance, but the probability is that in the
instances where this has occurred there has been
in the first instance absolute repose of the whole
body-there has been confinement to bed, no
pressure whatever on any portion of the limbs,
and at the same time much medicine has been
taken, which removes the inflammatory condition
of the body, and relieves any congestion of the
vascular system. The nausea of sea sickness often

produces a complete emptying out of the capil-
lary vessels, and hence some of those cures which

have been said to be effected by a sea voyage,

but which after all are in many instances apocry-
phal. After a protracted fit of the gout it has

often happened that for a time the most annoying

corns have vanished, and the invalid has in-
dulged in the fancy that the greater evil has

driven away the lesser. These hopes are destined
to meet with disappointment, for before many
weeks have elapsed he has sensible demonstration
D D

102 DISEASES OF THE FEET.
that there was but a cessation of hostilities, for

his enemy again invades his foot, and very pro-
bably takes up the precise position from which

he was supposed to be driven ; at other times
there is a curious metastasis, the great toe has
ceased to be the spot, and the little toe exhibits
the malady in all its most striking features. The
way in which the corn has been exfoliated is
sufficiently marked to show that the nutrition has
been cut off, for there is a large foramen ; this,
however, does not long exist. Cellular tissue is
formed, or else again does the rete mucosum
furnish its fluid to cause fresh depositions of the
layers which constitute the principal portion of the
corn. The same falling out of the corn has been
known to follow several of the inflammatory and

the exanthematous diseases. After variola or small-
pox there has been sometimes a perfect cure ; the

pustular action having, it would appear, superseded
the former abnormal state. This has likewise

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 103

been the case after scarlet fever, and upon the pro-
duction of a completely new epidermis there has

been a total cessation of all excrescences on the
feet. On the other hand they have been increased
by the development of particular diseases, more
especially those which affect the kidnies or the
urinary secretion. There is such a sympathy
existing between the organs which excrete the
fluid and the skin, that we are not at a loss to
account for diseases springing up in the one tissue
where the other has had its usual condition altered,
or where some of those changes which modern
chemistry has so clearly shown have occurred.
We cannot be surprised that after fractures of the
limb, after any affection requiring for any length
of time the horizontal position, that benefit has
been derived. The altered state of the circulation,
independent of the state of absolute quiescence, is
sufficient to account for this ; but it would be well
could we be assured that there would be no recur-

104 DISEASES OF THE FEET.
rence. Such, however, is not the case ; indeed,
we never can be sufficiently on our guard, even
under circumstances the most advantageous, against

their re- appearance, notwithstanding the precau-
tions that may be taken, unless they be founded

upon proper principles. A change of climate has
doubtless some influence. We find in the north
people exceedingly subject to corns, whilst in
warmer latitude they are scarcely to be found ;
then we must remember that, independent of the
exceeding cold, the inhabitants are apt to wear
very thick goloshes of an unyielding material over

their shoes. In St Petersburg and in Stock-
holm Chiropodists are in great demand, and if

thoroughly conversant with their duties would make
large fortunes, besides holding a proper position in
society. In the North of Germany corns are
frequent, whilst in Rome, in Naples, or in Madrid
they are not altogether so frequent ; it is true that
many ofthe social habits prevent this. Probably the

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 105

female inhabitants of Castile have the most per-
fectly formed foot and ankle of any race of

women, and corns are almost entirely unknown to
them.
When we reflect how much the well-being of
individuals depends upon domestic comfort and the
attention to minute points which escape the notice
of superficial observers, I feel persuaded that I
shall not be supposed to have treated the subject
of corns with more earnestness or with a greater
degree of anxiety than is necessary, and that the
long experience I have had fully justifies my
attempt to impress upon the minds of those to
whom the guardianship of infancy and of youth
belongs, the absolute necessity of watchfulness.

Studying as I have done under the first authori-
ties, I have had my theories corrected and my

opinions confirmed by practice.

EE

106 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

CHAPTER III.

are
THE bunnion differs from the corn in the
actual seat of the disease, for it involves the
integuments generally, and is attended with

active inflammation, so that the usual accompa-
niments of heat, swelling, and redness

attendant upon its progress. It is not to be con-
sidered as a simple induration of the mucus of

the rete accompanied by a morbid state of the

epidermis, but as an increase of the integu-
ments which belong to the great toe. It has

been confounded with corns and callosities, from
a want of investigation into the actual nature
of the disease. It runs the course of inflam-

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 107

mation, and is liable to the various terminations

which attend upon that state, for where resolu-
tion does not occur, there may be either effusion,

suppuration, or mortification, though fortunately
the instances are rare in which the worst form
of the disease appears. The first phalanx of the

toe has been so swollen, has put on such in-
flammatory action, that gout has been pronounced

to be present where this enlargement has existed ;
and as those who are somewhat in the vale of
years are more prone to be attacked by the
annoyance, it has often led to the suspicion that
it is in some measure connected with a gouty
diathesis ; the ordinary termination, however,
of the affection, where it has been judiciously
treated, so essentially differs from that of the
constitutional disorder, that the mistake is easily
rectified. The epidermis in such cases peels off
in scales, such as are produced in the onion,
from whence indeed it is supposed to derive its

108 DISEASES OF THE FEET.
name, at any rate the similarity to the French
word ' oignon, ' would lead to such a conclusion .
The bunnion must undoubtedly be admitted to be
the result of pressure in the first instance, and
is not unfrequently attended with a crop of corns,
but it is essentially a different disease from the
corn, and approaches more to the nature of the
diseases which affect the articulation of the joints,
involving many structures, and occasionally leaving
behind it serious mischief ; and although there
may be temporary alleviation of the inflammatory
symptoms, they are likely to recur, and often
exhibit peculiar phenomena, which lead to the

idea that there is some connexion with constitu-
tional malady.

It certainly has often occurred that the bunnion
has been mistaken for constitutional disease. We
have known an eminent statesman upon whom a
physician, who had distinguished himself by writing
a large octavo on the gout, was in constant

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 109

attendance, giving without remorse or dread, huge
doses of colchicum and magnesia, and prescribing

with great talent and skill all the usual well-
accustomed draughts and mixtures which that

ferocious enemy to the comforts of the great, the
gout, usually demands. Upon his altar had been

offered up innumerable gifts of phials and pill-
boxes ; still the enemy would maintain his position,

nor leave the comfortable quarters in which the

learned physician supposed he had installed him-
self, for some considerable length of time. The

patient having been for some time affected with
corns thought the present moment of repose a
favourable one for the cure of these additional
plagues. I was honoured with a summons ; my
first inspection convinced me that the " causa
teterrima " in this instance was a well-marked
bunnion. I felt it my duty, before offering my
opinion myself on the subject, to seek an interview
with the physician. It was graciously accorded
F F

110 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

me,
to me, and upon my expressing what had struck
he with great candour acknowledged that he

had not seen the supposed gouty foot, for know-
ing how subject his patient was to its paroxysms,

he had imagined that an incipient attack was the
cause of his suffering. I was left by him to follow
my own treatment after he was convinced that
there was much of truth in my view of the case,

for ocular inspection proved to him the enlarge-
ment of the integuments covering the first joint

of the great toe, and that the cuticle was
already thickened, and lay scaling, the whole
foot partook ofof the irritation, and some

febrile symptoms gave countenance to the idea en-
tertained by the physician of the nature of the

disease. A few hours were sufficient to restore
to his usual state this gentleman. All that it was
necessary for me to do was to apply a cataplasm of

the simplest kind, and to enjoin a horizontal posi-
tion. I was able a short time afterwards to give

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 111

permanent relief, and obtained some little share of
confidence for the manner in which I had acted,
as well from the physician as from the patient,
who remained perfectly ignorant that he had been
treated for an attack to which he had not been
subject. Similar cases have presented themselves
to me in which I have had occasion to find medical
men not so accurate in their diagnosis as they
should be, from the carelessness with which they
have been accustomed to treat the diseases of the
feet. They have been taught to look down upon

them as trifles altogether beneath their con-
sideration, the consequence of which has been that

they have mistaken diseases which demanded the
simplest treatment, for others which must be
actively met, or the system will succumb. It is
true, since Sir Benjamin Brodie has in his
masterly treatise explained some of the phenomena
attendant upon disease of the joints, that more
just estimates have been formed of the nature

112 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

of those affections to which the numerous joints
of the foot are subject, and the real cause of
some of the diseases more precisely ascertained.
The treatment of the bunnion, above all the
maladies to which the integuments of the foot are
liable, must depend upon the general skill and
well- founded experience of the practitioner. The
eye and tact are absolutely requisite to decide
upon what class of remedies he is to depend.
Cold applications, warm fomentations, are to be
employed, not indiscriminately, but according to
the actual appearances which are developed.
The remedies which in one instance are highly
beneficial, may be detrimental in another ; and
it is only from the actual ocular inspection of
the state of the foot that we can give directions
as to the course to be pursued. It is one of
those instances which the opposers of nosological
systems have so often brought forward. You call
certain symptoms by a certain name, and you

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 113

then have recourse to a certain class of remedies,
which have been found to be efficacious in that
disease, forgetting that in each individual instance
there are symptoms peculiar to it. You may
call an aggregate number of symptoms the gout,

and you may then immediately prescribe colchi-
cum ; but the wise practitioner knows that col-
chicum is not good in every stage of the gout ; and

that there are certain circumstances under which
it is not advantageously given. Thus it is with
the malady of which I have been speaking.
When a bunnion is present, the best application,
says a popular author, is an application of a
cataplasm of oatmeal and ground linseed, renewed
twice a day ; this appears in a volume which was
formerly in the hands of almost all who were
interested in the subjects of our discussion ; it
was the hand-book to which most men referred,
the guide whose authority was sufficient for all ;
but serious would be the consequences if every

G G

114 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

bunnion was thus indiscriminately treated ; sup-
puration and the worst consequences would ensue,

and though we are told that should purulent
matter be formed, we have nothing to do but to
keep the abscess clean and not irritate it, those
who have had to treat such abscesses, and still
more those who have had to encounter them,
know what time is consumed, what pain is
borne, and what irritation arises from such an
occurrence. This plan may well be followed where
resolution by other means cannot be prevented ;
the inflammation must, if possible, be speedily
brought to resolution ; the cold spirituous lotion,
mindererus' spirit, goulard solutions, are in general
first to be had recourse to ; but sometimes, and

here is judgment absolutely necessary, warm de-
coction of poppies, infusion of camomile flowers,

cataplasms of various kinds are the proper reme-
dies. Indeed I will scarcely venture to lay down

decisive rules, for everything must vary according

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 115

to circumstances. The nitro-muriatic pediluvium,
the mustard pediluvium, the acetous, all are
capable of affording relief. The most judicious
plan is to be guided by symptoms, to do nothing
that can keep upup irritation, to soothe and
palliate rather than attempt to drive away by
active means a malady which may, by injudicious
treatment, become a source of much pain and
lasting annoyance. I most earnestly recommend

that leeches should not be employed ; the quan-
tity drawn by them is never sufficient to do any

good, and much time is lost which might be
advantageously employed by other means. This
plan, which is followed upon every occasion where
inflammation occurs by surgeons in England,
often is attended with mischievous effects, and

leaves behind a degree of debility sometimes diffi-
cult to be overcome. How often have I known

a sufferer, first tormented with leeches, with
hot poultices, and then caustic, who would have

116 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

been quickly cured by simpler means, and would
have avoided, probably, a long confinement. I
would impress upon the minds of those who are
afflicted with bunnions that they never can be
thoroughly cured until every vestige of the stem
or root is skilfully removed. If careful instruction
be given, the enlargement of the joint will
thoroughly disappear.
I have just observed that there is something
so resembling the appearance of a fit of the gout

where a bunnion is present, that a skilful phy-
sician has been misled. Indeed, if attention be

not paid to the state of the constitution, this

may occur without much difficulty, for the tume-
faction, pain, and redness, which attend upon

both, require the experienced eye to detect

which of the two it is. Before an examina-
tion of the foot it is always necessary to hear

the statement of the patient, and you may most
generally form an accurate diagnosis from the

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 117

detail of his symptoms ; for, although there may
be constitutional derangements attendant upon the
bunnion, as well as upon gout, yet I have always
observed them to be of a different character.
The gout is ushered in by a train of symptoms
peculiar to itself—the flatulence, heart-burn, and
the dyspeptic signs are of a very marked
character, more especially in those who once
have had a

paroxysm. The febrile state, too, is
one of a high degree of irritation, of which the
mind partakes as well as the body. From bunnion
there is an excruciating pain during the night, but
there is not that singular sensation which has
been so admirably described by Sydenham, of
utter impossibility of finding a position that is
a relief from pain. That great physician was
himself a martyr to the gout, and if he had
during the paroxysm minuted down each varying

sensation as it arose, he could not more accu-
rately have described this disease as it presents

itself under ordinary circumstances, and in the

H H

118 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

greater number of cases in which it affects in-
dividuals. The pain supervenes in bunnion some-
time after the swelling, whilst in gout the violent

lancinating pain comes on before there is any
appearance whatever of inflammatory symptoms
about the part where the disease is to show
itself ; the pain,, too, generally confines itself
to the joint of the toe the foot, and the
ankle do not sympathise, as is the case in gout ;

the paroxysm of this latter disease commonly com-
mences early in the morning and remits towards

evening, whilst the bunnion is generally relieved
after the night's sleep, and it is in consequence
of the fatigue of the day that it shows itself in

its worst character towards evening. There is sel-
dom that exquisite sensibility to the touch which

makes the gouty person dread the approach of
any one to him. By this explanation the reader
will have some knowledge of the means by which
the two affections should be distinguished, even
without ocular demonstration.

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 119

CHAPTER IV.

THE callosity differs from the corn in the
actual seat of the disease ; it is the epidermis,
which becomes thickened, and most frequently
in considerable masses, when great pressure has
for any length of time existed . The structure
of the epidermis does not appear to be changed,
as in the corn, for the external aspect of the

integument remains much as it did in its pre-
vious state. Some callosities are remarkable for

the extent over which they spread, occupying not
unfrequently the largest portion of the sole of
the foot ; and frequently there is one on the joint
immediately beneath the little toe. This cal-

120 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

losity is often interspersed with many little
spots or corns ; this gives considerable pain, and
has the appearance of a large protuberance,

something similar to the bunnion, which осси-
pies only the large toe ; indeed, some inex-
perienced persons have made this mistake, but

it is right that I should correct a misstatement
made by so many authors, that more than one
bunnion has appeared on each foot at a time ; this
cannot be the case, for it is only the joint of the
great toe which is subject to this disease . Sometimes
there is scarcely any swelling, but pain and heat
are felt on the joint of the great toe, where in a
little time there will be found a bunnion, which
always occupies that part of the foot, and never
exists elsewhere, so that it is impossible there could
be two bunnions on one foot. This is the callosity
which must have been misnamed a bunnion.
There are, however, cases in which, like a
corn , it is limited to a small spot, and then

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 121

there is some slight difficulty in the diagnosis,
at least by those who have not enjoyed the
practical opportunity of becoming familiar with

all the varieties of the defects which present them-
selves in the feet where there is any deviation from

the ordinary laws of nature. Sometimes a corn
will shoot up in the very centre of the indurated
mass, arising most probably from the irritation
produced upon the rete mucosum. There are few
persons who are entirely free from some callosity ;
occasionally they pass altogether unnoticed. They
give neither annoyance nor pain ; they remain
stationary, neither enlarging nor diminishing,
but furnishing an additional protection to an
otherwise tender and easily acted-on surface. It
not unfrequently occurs that, although during
a very long period a callosity has never been
the source of the slightest uneasiness, it, from
some unexplained cause, or more probably from
an alteration in the sort of boot or shoe
I I

122 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

worn, suddenly exhibits its power of diminishing
the comforts of life ; first, a sense of heat, of
tingling, of shooting, is perceptible, and gradually
inconvenience, annoyance, and even severe pain
are felt. And, under such circumstances, I find
that it is generally believed that there is more
difficulty in effecting a cure than where it
had been perceived at an early stage, and had
met with that attention which every disordered
state requires ; but my own experience tells me
that however late the sufferer seeks relief, that

it may be given if the plan I propose be fol-
lowed. The edges of the heels, the outer ball

of the great toe, the soles of the feet, and
various parts of the surface of the little toes, are
more or less the objects of the invasion of these
disagreeable callosities. They bear a considerable
resemblance, both in the proximate and exciting
causes, to those indurations of the dermoid
coverings which occur in the hands, on the

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 123

shoulders, the knees, and the elbows of persons
occupied in various of the departments of life , in
which pressure upon these portions of the body
takes place, and more especially if any degree of
friction accompanies the pressure. The knees
of women employed in scouring or cleaning

exhibit something of this kind, whilst the hard-
ness of the integuments of the palms of the

hands of those occupied in the manipulation
demanded in mechanics may also be justly
compared with that which is found on various
parts of the feet.
Looking at the callosity in its worst state—

examining all the circumstances which are con-
nected with it, and the numerous examples which

have fallen under my superintendence-I should
say that to the experienced man there is
great difficulty, but to the uninitiated there is a
great deal, which I hope I shall be enabled to show
him is to be avoided. On dissecting away the

124 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

integument there will be found numerous stems
embedded in cells which bear every resemblance
to the ordinary corn ; these must altogether be
thoroughly, completely, and carefully removed.
They must be eradicated by gentle, but certain
means ; they are not to be cut out, but taken
away by an instrument properly formed, and it
must be borne in mind that if they are not all
removed there will be the probability, nay, even
the certainty of a return. The great skill ofthe

Chiropodist is here exhibited ; he is not to per-
form a showy operation, but he is to extirpate,

by gradual but certain manipulation, that which
is at present troublesome, and would, if any small
portion be allowed to remain, become a cause of
future sorrow. I would impress upon the minds
of those who may have such cases that they are
not to be misled by the apparent facility with
which they can operate, for wounds here are
most dangerous. We have to dread, where

"

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 125
ignorance and rashness are too predominant,
convulsions, lock-jaw, and those sad terminations
which I have already alluded to.
There is a circumstance which is particularly
remarkable with regard to these callosities, which
is, that they are not, like corns, the effect of the
pressure produced in walking, or by tight shoes,
which undoubtedly must be considered the usual
exciting cause of these annoyances, for they are
found to occur with great frequency amongst those
who take little pedestrian exercise, who wear the
easiest shoes, and who are particularly sedentary.

It is a curious fact that those who ride on horse-
back and are amongst the foremost in the chase,

are strikingly liable to these affections. We have
known men who are remarkable for their love of
hunting, who have no other rural pursuit to which
they are partial, who neither shoot nor fish, and
who, when in town, take little but carriage exercise ,
suffer in a singular degree from hard, thickened,
K K

126 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

callous indurations around the heel, and they are
not unfrequently exceedingly sensitive. The whole
epidermis is in such cases unusually dry, ragged,
and small papula in groups cover its surface ; those

who are advanced in years seem to be more sub-
ject to the rapid advance of these indurations, and

they seldom can check them unless they have
frequent recourse to the pediluvium of a high
temperature, followed by rubbing the surface for
some considerable length of time with a rough dry
towel ; indeed many persons have found their only
relief from following this plan systematically for a
considerable length of time, and even if they have

abandoned it, from the total absence of the cal-
losity, they have found it to return and to become

even more troublesome than before. It does
sometimes happen that nature herself performs a
cure, and the disorganized substance falls off, or
is rubbed off, and this is now and then done
as effectually and as clearly as it would be by

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 127

the knife, or by arsenic applied to a can-
cerous or schirrous surface ; but a large foramen

is usually left, which sometimes for a considerable
length of time exists without being filled up ; at
others an unusual growth appears with several corns
in the centre ; there are indeed numerous varieties
of these callosities, which experience can alone
attempt to describe, explain, or cure. There is
one, however, which I cannot pass by in silence,
because when it does occur it puts the patient
to the greatest inconvenience and suffering.
It is when the induration takes place on the apex
of the great toe immediately in the skin in
contact with the nail. Its commencement is so
insensible and gradual that it is not unusual
that it entirely escapes observation until it begins

to assume a serious character and to be accom-
panied with tumefaction, heat, redness, and pain.

A thin superficies of the skin is at first the only
seat of callus, and this induration is probably

128 DISEASES OF THE FEET.
unnoticed until the whole of the immediate
neighbourhood is involved in the same state ;
the skin becomes almost transparent, the nail
partakes of the diseased action, its root adds to
the irritation, the pain is often so acute as to
prevent sleep, the constitution, probably naturally
irritable, is more or less influenced by it ; of
course all attempt at movement is quite out of

the question, for its consequence would, inde-
pendent of the pain produced, be most serious .

This callus is not large, but most probably,
from its embracing much of the nervous papillæ
that are distributed over the toes,, becomes
the source of all those inconveniences just
mentioned, and which, when I have been

called upon to remedy, I have found to pro-
duce serious effect upon the health.

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 129

CHAPTER V.

WARTS have found more distinguished sur-
gical inquirers than corns ; the frequency of their

occurrence on the hands, and the unsightly ap-
pearance which they there present, have most

probably led to the investigations which even
John Hunter did not disdain to pursue ; but

after all that has been done, and after even micro-
scopic examination, the exact nature of these

66
plague spots, ” as they have been termed by one
who was infested with them, and could by no
means suggested to him entirely eradicate them,
is not understood. Various, however, have been

the attempts to ascertain from what particular por-
LL

130 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

tion of the dermoid coverings they spring, and the

contradictory opinions only serve to show how un-
equal is the best judgment of a single individual

upon some of apparently the most trivial of the
works of nature. Some of the various forms in
which these excrescences appear evidently show
that they are in some measure connected with the
constitution ; and though they wear the form of

a local disorder, yet are they more or less in-
fluenced by some state of health which is not

fully understood. The wart differs from the corn
in its texture ; more organized matter enters into
its composition, as is evinced by the facility with
which bleeding is produced when the slightest
incision has been made ; nor is it so thick, hard,
horny, or impenetrable, although it has a surface
occasionally of much roughness, hardness, and
thickness. Their attachment toto the body is
altogether of a different character -they burrow
more completely under the surface of the integu-

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 131

ment, and are held on by a species of peduncle
sometimes of great broadness ; at others, of very
slight and pendulous form. To describe them
would be out of the question, for their general
characters are well known ; they seem, however,
in modern days to be much less frequent, even
among schoolboys, than they were. Whether this

is attributable to greater cleanliness, or to differ-
ent habits of life , I will not attempt to discuss ;

but certain it is that the cases are rarer than they
were, and even in large schools they do not
infest the hands of boys with the same inveteracy
they did formerly. They do occasionally occur,
and sometimes attain a considerable size, when
there would seem to be no means of accounting

for their origin or development. Improper nutri-
tion has been said to be one of the frequent

sources of these excrescences ; rye bread, and
beans (substituted, when roasted, for coffee) , have
had these deformities laid to their charge ;

132 DISEASES OF THE FEET .

others, again, have spoken of the secretion of the
kidneys being surcharged with acid, which, not

carried away, has been borne into the small cuti-
cular papillæ, which have become enlarged. Nor

have some theorists been wanting in what has
been called extravagance, who have assigned to
globules of mercury taken by the parents the
"fons et origo malorum. " It has been said
that they are pustules containing an infinitesimal
portion of some other of the mineral or organic
bodies which have not found their due action in
nature's laboratory, the stomach, and are therefore
to be elsewhere expelled by the “ vis medicatrix
naturæ. "
The humoral pathologists have been more than
usually eloquent upon these apparently little

foes to health, and have talked of the expul-
sion of gross morbific matter unfortunately

stopped in its career, and determined to the
surface of the skin, where, not meeting with a

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 133

of

proper mode of escape, it has caused inflamma-
tion of the papillæ, subsequent formation

callosity, and consequent alteration of structure.
As it is not for me, " tantas conponere lites, "

I will not further discuss the matters con-
nected with their origin than to say that they

appear to be a congeries of vessels surrounded
by a thin coating of epidermis, the rete mucosum,
and the cutis vera.
It might indeed be a subject of medical

inquiry, not unworthy the highest of those intel-
lectual men who devote themselves to the relief

of their fellow beings, what is the precise nature
of these diseased portions of the skin ; for there
are many circumstances which lead to a belief
that they are more intimately blended with the
constitution than we are at first sight led to
allow, for often they seem indications of specific
diseases. They are found to accompany some
of those loathsome affections to which human

M M

134 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

nature is prone, and they are also found in some
instances to wear a remarkable cancerous tendency,
running, after long existence in a quiescent state,
into active disease ; we find, too, that when they
occur in large numbers upon various parts of the
body, and return again with great quickness, after
they have apparently been eradicated, that they
more or less affect the whole of the system,
and that elderly people are not so subject to
them as the young and active ; that when they
do make their appearance they are not apt to
remain in an indolent state, but to put on a degree
of active inflammation, which demands the most

serious attention. The point connected with con-
tagion is one of curious, but at present of un-
satisfactory inquiry ; for although from cases

beyond suspicion it has been seen that an in-
fected person has conveyed them to another, yet,

on the other hand, so many other instances exist
where there has not been the slightest conta-

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 135

mination, although every facility has existed, and
even inoculation has failed, that many persons
altogether deny its possibility. It may, however,
be affirmed, as I believe may be said of almost
all contagious and infectious disorders, that where
there is a predisposition in an individual to a
particular complaint, the slightest exposure will
prove sufficient for his imbibing it ; and, on the

other hand, some individuals are altogether in-
capable of being in the slightest degree affected,

even when exposed to the virulence in its most
concentrated form. The pain which results from
these excrescences is generally very trifling, unless
they are of a large size, are in a bad position,
or have put on any strikingly diseased action ;
and they may exist for a considerable length of

time on the hands without producing any un-
easiness whatever. Upon the feet, however, they

are much more likely to become speedily a source
of much annoyance, and sometimes they have been

136 DISEASES OF THE FEET.
known from untoward circumstances to become a
matter of much moment. I have seen indeed

cases in which maladies of a much more dan-
gerous kind have been borne with greater forti-
tude and philosophy than when warts have at

first been the only complaint. It is when they
have been seated on the sole of the foot, or
upon the toes, that they have worn a form
likely to produce considerable mischief, and to be
the cause of pain of the most excruciating kind .

It can well be understood how in such situa-
tions they are kept in a state of miserable

irritation, every movement of the body operating
upon them, and keeping them in a state of

constant inflammation. The slightest touch aggra-
vates them ; they are incessantly exposed to

friction, to pressure, to bruises, they are pinched,
squeezed, tormented, until at last ulcers of a very
serious nature are produced, and then commences
a long train of acute suffering and of insup-

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 137

portable agony, such as those only who have
endured or seen others afflicted by, can form the
slightest conception. A more ingenious method
of torture could not have been found for the
regicide Damian, nor for the miserable martyrs
who fell into the clutches of the holy Inquisition.
This may appear an exaggerated picture, but
I have known such cases where, too, corns have
been supposed to be present. A case occurred
to me in Cork during a short visit. Dr William

Murphy, an eminent physician in extensive prac-
tice there, had long suffered from a wart on

the sole of his foot, which he fancied a corn.
He had been under the care of persons who
professed themselves capable of relieving him.
He placed himself under my care, a single
operation cured him ; and some years have

elapsed without the recurrence of a single incon-
venience. He, previously to my examination, told

me that he would with pleasure confine himself for

N N

138 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

four or five days if necessary, and was as much
pleased as he was surprised to find immediately
after the operation that he was perfectly capable of
following his occupations in a much easier manner
than he had been enabled to do for a long
time. All that is demanded on such occasions
is a thorough knowledge of what can be done.
I have no secret, I have no nostrum ; experience
and attention are what I rely upon.
A curious chapter might be written upon the
popular ideas which have existed with regard to
warts and the means which have been adopted
for their cure. It would illustrate the history of
the progress of true science -it would show how
ignorance is led by pretended wisdom, how often
superstition and the dread of some unknown
agency will induce persons to try as remedies the
most extraordinary substances, and to place a
firm belief in supernatural assistance. That those
who feel only astonishment at the mysteries of

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 139

Nature, without any attempt to ascertain on what
they depend, should blindly rush forward and
grasp at any object recommended to them for
the relief of their ailments, cannot so much

surprise us, but we cannot withhold our asto-
nishment and regret when we find men capable

of penetrating a portion of the veil which hides
from the world at large the region of truth
fondly and foolishly placing their faith in inert
substances, and having recourse to charms, to
spells, and to various absurdities, when they
might much more easily look for truer and for
better things. In the list of medical authorities
who have fostered popular prejudices, and perhaps
have earnestly believed in the truth of their
mysterious remedies, we find names of great

eminence—men who have distinguished them-
selves not only as the collectors together of the

experience of others, but who themselves have
possessed both the power and the wish to in-

140 DISEASES OF THE FEET.
vestigate the value of medicinal substances.
Boerhaave and Sauvages were not free from these
faults, and there are many who have collected
together the instances of credulity. Can it

be really believed that a professor in a uni-
versity of some reputation would instil upon

the minds of his patients the doctrine that the
lichens which are said to be found upon the
dead body of a murdered person can effectually
cure warts ; or that another philosopher equally

eminent should assert that from his own expe-
rience they were to be completely eradicated by

means of a thread extracted from the linen near
the arm-pit of a person executed for crime ; that
another should prescribe the stealing of a small
piece of the sirloin of beef from a butcher's shop,
burying it beneath the ground, and believe that as
it slowly disorganized so would the warts decay. A
few words muttered over the disordered part
were affirmed to be completely efficacious, if the

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 141

person who pronounced them was the seventh
son of a seventh son. The fasting saliva has
long been held as a decided cure, as also the
mucus issuing from the snail, the bezoar, the
rubbing daily with a diamond, and many other
sagacious ideas have issued from men's minds, and
their believers have been tempted to follow the

advice ; and as not unfrequently these warts dis-
appear without any adequate reason, their de-
parture is ascribed to the wondrous power of the

favourite remedy, and " post hoc, propter hoc " is a
quite sufficient ground for further trial of the
important agent. There is little doubt that
many of the families of particular classes in the
vegetable kingdom act upon warts—some of them
by their acrid powers, others by their natural
acids. In the class Ranunculaceæ we find several
families and their species which evidently possess

considerable powers of action upon the integu-
ments of the skin, and have been employed both

0 0

142 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

popularly and scientifically for some length of
time with considerable success, but they are not
all of them entirely innocuous. One or two species
of the genus ranunculus have a very curative
juice, whilst if some others are mistaken for it

they produce considerable mischief. The ranun-
culus acris possesses very striking properties, and

has been used with much success, but the
sceleratus has been known, when employed, to
blister the skin in а most striking manner,
producing considerable ulceration, attended with

an effusion of a very acrid lymph, which, bur-
rowing in the surrounding cellular membrane, has

caused very extensive tumefaction, attended with
numbness, and sensation of torpor throughout
the whole of the upper extremity. There are

others of this genus which are equally produc-
tive of annoyance. In this order stands the

delphinium stavisagria, a herb which certainly
deserves the favourable notice which it gained

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 143

from our older herbalists ; the part of the plant
employed is the powder of the root ; this sprinkled

over a wart acts as a mild escharotic, seldom pro-
ducing any irritation, and under its employments

occasionally the largest warts have disappeared ;
and it is a well- ascertained fact, that when warts
of considerable magnitude disappear, all the smaller
ones in its immediate neighbourhood follow so
good an example.

surface of the

The skin seems to undergo
a change, and new action throughout the
surrounding parts seems to be
rapidly put on. Amongst the umbelliferous class
are found several families which are actually to
be depended upon in the very early stage of
warts, before they have acquired any large size,
or become prominent -the conium maculatum,
the æthusa cynapium, the cuminum cyminum ;
the latter is a very favourite remedy in many
parts of Europe, for the resolution of affections
of the skin, for scrofulous enlargements or tumors ;

144 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

the seeds applied in little bags, rendered warm,
have considerable influence. This is the plant
which the Romans extol so highly, for its effects

as a detergent, and certainly when taken inter-
nally it has much power over the whole surface

of the skin, although it seems to have no remedial
agency in actual diseases of the coverings ; it

drives away blotches, maculæ, warts, and ex-
crescences which disfigure. Dioscorides, and Galen

more especially, allude to its power upon the face,
whilst Avicenna recommends its external use to
beautify the complexion ; this it is that the student
took when he wished to appear in Rome as the
deep-reading man ; the disciples of the Orator
Porcius Latro, who desired to imitate their
master in the delicate paleness of his countenance,
as well as in his oratory, were in the habit of
drinking of the " pallentis grana cumini. " Several
other herbs might be enumerated, many of which
doubtless have gained celebrity from the friction

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 145

which has been employed ; for sometimes, when
accident has caused the surrounding part to be
inflamed, the absorbents have quickly carried away
the heterogeneous mass which has incumbered it.
What have I to say of the spider's cobweb,
were I to give my sanction in its favour, might
I not be ranked amongst those whom I have
just noticed, not only as credulous themselves, but
as the cause of credulity in others ; but I have
certainly heard some narratives, although I have
no experience myself, which would stagger my
disbelief. It has been said that this animal
secretion has slight caustic power ; that it arrests
bleeding from small vessels there can be no
doubt, but that may arise from its producing a
coagulum, which many thin substances, such as
cotton, thread, or fur, will do.
After all, however, that has been written, and
well weighing the numerous recipes that exist,
I firmly believe that there are but two ways of

P P

146 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

altogether getting rid of these troublesome dis-
figurements ; the one, by dispersing and acting

upon them by means of corroding or caustic
substances ; the other, under certain circumstances,
by excision. These are the only means by
which we can altogether assure ourselves of
success ; for they may last for a considerable
length of time whilst inefficient treatment is
followed, and they may give rise to a crop of
similar substances on some other portion of the
hands. The actual cautery, or the burning off

warts, has very properly been long since aban-
doned, for it was found that only the external

surface was acted upon ; in some instances, how-
ever, a red-hot wire passed through the body of

the wart has been speedily followed by its total
disappearance. The hydrochlorate of ammonia
dissolved in water, and the hydrochlorate of
lime are the most certain means of destroying
them ; the process, however, in both instances is

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 147

very slow, and demands perseverance, for if dis-
continued before the proper time, no advantage

is derived. The warts are to be kept constantly
moist with the solution of one or other of these
neutral salts, small folds of linen are to be
soaked in it, and applied at night ; but this
must be duly attended to. It must not be the
practice for two or three days, and then laid
aside ; it must be followed up for a month, at
the end of which time it will be found that the
excrescence no longer exists, and it will not
again return. Success almost always follows upon
this plan, and therefore it is the one I would
urge as that upon which the greatest reliance
can be placed. The most obstinate warts, that
had baffled the attention of the most skilful,
and that had re-appeared after other treatment,
completely yielded to this ; and since it has
become under ordinary circumstances the plan
I recommend to be pursued. Nitric acid, as a

148 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

caustic remedy, has been extensively
but it requires judgment and

used,

a

careful ap-
plication ; it is not to be indiscriminately

employed, it is not to be looked upon as a
domestic remedy which may or may not be
tried, according

to the caprice

of an individual.

It is capable

of being mischievous

; those, there-
fore, who use it must have experience

and

reason

to guide

them. A drop upon the

centre
of the wart is all that is required

; some-
times the diluted acid will succeed

where the

concentrated

fails. Excision

demands

tact, is

painful, and is not to be performed

by the

uninitiated. Much

of the same dexterity
which

the corn requires

must be shown

for warts ;

and, although

we need not apprehend

danger,

we must remember

that there

are many
bad

effects consequent

upon

ill-judged

incision.

Ligature

by a thread, if there be a simple

pendulous

basis, will often be quite enough
; if

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 149

not, the caustic potash, or nitrate of silver, may be
gently applied to the surface remaining. Warts

on the soles of the feet are oftentimes most trou-
blesome, and are to be treated with great tender-
ness, for they are sometimes irritable, and are

accompanied by itching of an annoying character,
and a species of tickling which is almost as
insupportable as direct pain. The next object
of my consideration must be to point out the
means by which these diseases whether they
are of a trifling or an aggravated character may
be avoided ; for it would not be productive of
benefit to the reader or to the practitioner simply
to state what is to be done when maladies are
present, but to show what precautions may be
taken to prevent their approach. The old
adage, " Prevention is better than cure, " is as
judicious as it is necessary ; and if we cannot,

from the habits of life, pay quite as much at-
tention to the feet as to the hands, we may,

Q Q

150 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

nevertheless, remember how much of good is to
be derived from care. Although the feet are
more out of immediate sight, they are still
most important members of the individual.

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 151

CHAPTER VI.

THE management of the feet has been, in
the preceding pages, the subject of a vast
variety of hints from me, yet I think that, even
with the accusation of a repetition of my

recommendations, and the fear of being some-
what tedious, I may point out some circum-
stances which are essentially necessary to the

comforts of life, and which may be considered
of no small importance when we reflect that,
as age advances, everything that tends to render
us incapable of taking moderate exercise, that
produces inconvenience, fatigue, and listlessness,
must shorten the period of existence, and render

152 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

those later days, which ought to be spent in
cheerfulness and serenity, dwelling upon the
past in order to prepare ourselves for the future,
uncomfortable to bear. The greater the care of
the minutiæ, or what are often termed the trifles
of life, the less will there be of the peevishness
and moroseness which too often accompany the
end of our career ; and few there are who, in
the height of early joys, when " youth is at the
prow, and pleasure at the helm, " think that,
however " fair laughs the morn, " the bark will not

always glide smoothly down the stream, and there-
fore carelessly listen to the admonition of those

who have had experience. The young pedestrian,
who, with knapsack on his back, scales the
summits of the lofty Ben Lomond, or who
perambulates, untired, the valleys of Switzerland,
and congratulates himself that he can walk forty
miles a day, might preserve his powers with
little deterioration if, during these praiseworthy

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 153

excursions, which ought to bring health and
knowledge, he pays due attention to those
humble instruments by whose means he attains
so much enjoyment. ByBy following a proper
system not only may he traverse all parts of the
world uninjured and in comfort, but he may be
enabled to do so, though probably not with the
same vigour, when the snow begins to appear on
his head, and when generally activity and power
of walking cease in individuals. By careful
attention to his shoes, which should be large
enough to admi of the natural swelling of the
feet ; by wearing stockings of soft and yielding
material, which fit without leaving much margin
either at the toes or at the heels ; by carefully

sponging the feet at the end of the day's pro-
gress with cold water impregnated with salt ;

and by gentle friction with a hard towel, keep-
ing the legs for a short time after exercise in

a relaxed position-he will be ready for the

R R

154

DISEASES OF THE FEET.

next day's march without feeling lassitude or
inconvenience. Should the least blister appear,
it must be opened with a needle, the foot kept
immersed in warm water until every portion of
the effused fluid is discharged ; this is assisted
by gentle pressure, and friction must for a short
time afterwards be persevered in.
It is almost a work of supererogation for me

to point out the absolute necessity of foot clean-
liness to a civilized and cultivated people ; every

one who has the slightest self- respect or desire for
health must be too well aware of the necessity
of constant ablution ; holy writ has proclaimed that
" cleanliness is next to godliness, " and though
probably it may be rather intended for the heart
and for the intellect, yet as a moral duty it
cannot be too frequently inculcated. One of the
greatest duties, both according to the Mosaic
dispensation, and also the commands of the
Mahometan lawgiver, is frequent ablution. I

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 155

have always found that this duty is best attended
to, if it is followed with determined regularity ;
two evenings in the week the feet should be
immersed in the warm pediluvium, about ninety
degrees of Fahrenheit is a temperature that is
generally preferable, somewhat higher is required
for persons more advanced in life , but above
one hundred degrees is seldom desirable ; besides
this, morning and evening, careful sponging with
either hot or cold water should be attended to.
In early life the habit of plunging the feet into
cold water, morning and evening, may be fairly
and properly inculcated ; but this must not be
commenced at a late period of life ; more
especially the cold water at night should be
avoided, for apoplexy, gout in the stomach, and
other diseases may supervene upon injudiciously
commencing such new practices. Sir Astley Cooper,
than whom no man ever enjoyed better health,
and who lived to a later period than the ordinary

156 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

days of life, used to state in those valuable
lectures which for a series of years he delivered

for the benefit of medical science, that he attri-
buted his well-being to his daily immersing his

feet in cold water as soon as he arose, and to
his use of a rough towel immediately after it.
In the coldest day of winter he was to be seen
without a great coat, with silk stockings on his
legs, and short breeches, traversing the court of
the hospital, or sitting in his carriage. Numerous
indeed are the instances in which this truly
hydropathic cure for affections of the feet has
been attended with signal success. Hot water is
apt to make the feet tender and susceptible ;
hence it is that I do not recommend the heat
to be above ninety degrees. If the water is
above ninety- eight degrees, or what is generally
termed blood heat, there is a tendency to an

undue determination of the blood, and the vas-
cular system becomes too full, besides which

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 157

there is not unfrequently some degree of fever-
ishness produced ; as a remedial agent, however,

the heat may be increased, —I now speak of it
merely as necessary for personal cleanliness.
The sponge should be most sedulously applied
to the ankle, between the toes, and around
the nails these are the portions which more
absolutely demand strict watch, and they should
be thoroughly dried by the towel, no part
should remain at all moist or damp. There is
no objection to using afterwards a little eau de

Cologne, or aromatic vinegar, or the Min-
dererus' spirit. The evaporation which they oc-
casion is cool and comfortable. It is not

right to leave the feet, after this, long exposed
to the action of the air ; the stocking should
be drawn quickly on, and a loose slipper worn
for some little time. It is seldom right to
keep the feet in cold air after immersion in
hot water ; this, however, depends upon the

SS

158 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

condition of the individual ; those who are deli-
cate must necessarily be more cautious than

the robust, who are seldom affected by such
inconsiderable circumstances. Those who suffer
from immoderate perspiration of the feet should
use a solution of the chlorate of lime or of
soda for its prevention, more especially if it be
attended by any foetor, which sometimes occurs,

but more generally as an indication of consti-
tutional disorder than of local affection. The

sponge, moistened with equal parts of
camphor julep, of Mindererus' spirit, with a few
drops of spirits of lavender, will often put a
stop to the most disagreeable effluvium which
arises. The frequent change of the stocking
during a hot day is necessary to some persons
-to all it is a luxury-but is scarcely needed.
In thus giving advice for the preservation of the
feet, it must be remembered that the active and
the inactive are to be considered by me, and

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 159

that I have laid down general rules for the

guidance of all, but there are many circum-
stances which would naturally modify my treat-
ment. I would have every one careful, whilst

he is studying the precepts best adapted for his
own case, to remember that there may be too
much attention as well as too little ; that too
much delicacy is as injudicious as too much
carelessness. The equilibrium of health is to be
maintained by a knowledge of what is to be done,
and by judiciously carrying into practice those
rules which carry with them the semblance of

truth ; that it is impossible to lay down one un-
changeable rule, as all men are not equally adapted

to the bed of Procrustes, so neither are one set of
regulations to be followed by all.

Each person
is marked with peculiarities ; and, as no two faces
are precisely similar, so are there no parts of
the body in two individuals bearing precisely
the same stamp, or obedient to the same in-

160 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

fluences ; but there are general and defined laws
which regulate all things, and enable us to
arrive at conclusions which embrace the larger
portion of that which has been created.
The time necessary for keeping the feet in warm
water must be noticed by me, because it is not
unfrequent for persons to entertain the idea that
they should be immersed for a considerable
length of time in order to be productive of
the end required. This is a great mistake, all

the benefit which is to be derived may be ob-
tained in about ten minutes, and all further

foot-bathing is not only useless, but may in some
instances be prejudicial, leaving behind a sense

of weariness, undue heat, and sometimes pulsa-
tion of the arteries. One great objection to

the long employment of hot water, which has

not been often pointed out, but which not un-
frequently arises, is the production of what are

termed varicose veins. The vascular system

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 161

losing its due equilibrium, the result has been
that tumid state of the veins which is often
very difficult of remedy.

Some persons are
apt to keep the feet in the bath, and to go
on adding hot water as the first quantity cools
down this is injudicious, for all that is required
is to immerse them for the length of time I
have pointed out. Bran is occasionally added
to the water, sometimes the powder of mustard

seed, and small quantities of acids ; these, how-
ever, demand the consideration of the medical

man ; certain it is that the hydrochloric and
the nitric acids may be made, through the
pediluvium, to have considerable influence upon
the general as well as the local state. During

the summer the bathing should be more fre-
quent than in the winter, if the habit of

bathing twice a week, as I have recommended,
be not pursued. After this, friction with a
hard, dry towel should be strictly persevered in.

TT

162 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

I am no advocate for the use of the flesh brush ;
I find there is not that hard rubbing which is
necessary, and that, from the unevenness of the
surface of the hairs, there is not that general
effect produced ; besides which, itching and
much irritation not unfrequently follows upon
this treatment. The great desideratum is to
render the feet perfectly dry, taking care that
the pores of the epidermis are kept quite free
from any lamina which impede the proper
perspiration. Besides this usual immersion,
the simple sponging with luke-warm water,
morning and evening, will be productive of a
high degree of comfort, and will promote that
general and local ease which all who value
the blessings of a healthy state will be most
anxious to enjoy.
What sort of stockings do you recommend ? is
a question very often put to me, and I must
confess it is one that I sometimes feel that I

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 163

cannot answer to the satisfaction of my patients,
for I know such is the general and very deserved
preference given to the silk stocking, that I shall
not satisfy my inquirer by advising the use of any
other. It is, however, fortunate that silk, which
from its material is so flexible, and so ornamental,

is from other causes the best ; yet there are cir-
cumstances under which worsted or woollen may

be far preferable. Were I to tell a delicate young
lady, whose foot and ankle are the theme of
admiration, and make her "the observed of all
observers," that she would enjoy dancing most
in woollen stockings, feel less fevered, and be
infinitely less tired, with whatever respect I
might be listened to, I know that I dare not

anticipate obedience ; as the fair Narcissa pro-
claimed " woollen odious, " so do I feel that the

same epithet would be applied to my advice in
stockings. Yet how much better would a fair
one feel on the following day.

At the same

164 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

time I do not consider, for the mere ordinary

occupation of dancing, for the transient amuse-
ment of the time, that it is necessary to discard

the silk stocking. I merely mean to say, that
where much muscular movement occurs, where

there is much perspiration, woollen is very advan-
tageously worn, it is very far superior to cotton

and linen ; both these substances become, after a
time, saturated with the moisture from the feet, are

then hardened, will absorb no more, and gene-
rate lasting inconvenience. The soldier on a

He knows that
long day's march feels the difference between a
stocking of worsted and of cotton.
the former will enable him to bear twice the
quantity of fatigue-that he will have less chance
of blisters-that he has nothing hard, cold, and
stiff between his foot and his shoe ; and although
the day be exceeding hot, and perspiration flow
with unabated vigour, he feels that he derives
the greater comfort from that which at first

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 165

appears too hot, and too likely to superinduce
fatigue. I have elsewhere spoken of silk as the
best material for stockings, especially in the

winter ; and, under all circumstances, it is doubt-
less preferable. It is singular to find that the

Parisian ladies, so fond of displaying the beauty
of the foot and ankle, always give the preference
to cotton stockings ; they require the most delicate
texture, and are of opinion that they are the
most elegant. They, however, are generally great
sufferers from affections of the feet, and there is
more room for study of the deviations from the
healthy state of the foot to be found in Paris
than elsewhere ; indeed there is a singular sensibility
and nervous susceptibility about them, which may
in some measure arise from the want of proper
pavement in Paris, and the determination to
have the smallest possible foot. Indeed, there
candidates for Cinderella's pigmy
slipper in that gay metropolis than in all the
are more

UU

166 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

rest of Europe. Care should be taken that
the stocking is not too short for the foot ; few
there are who pay attention to this point. The
toes become cramped, and this is often worse
than shoes that pinch the feet ; more especially
should this be attended to in early youth, when
the full development is taking place. Many of

the disfigurements which are attributed to inat-
tention to the shoe arise from this cause.

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 167

CHAPTER VII.

THE nails are not subject to diseases of so
serious a character as those which we have
already described ; yet a work upon the treatment
of the feet would not be complete without a general

inquiry into the circumstances immediately con-
nected with them. They perform some important

functions in the human economy ; and though pro-
bably not of so much importance to man in the

highly civilized state into which his exertions have
brought him, still they are not to be passed over as
unimportant. Doubtless, to tribes dependent entirely
for their daily subsistence upon the means with
which Nature has endowed them for their varied

168 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

pursuits of hunting, of fishing, and of gathering
from the earth the herbs which they require, a

substance which is not unlike the claws of quad-
rupeds or the beaks of birds might be absolutely

necessary. The more polished races of man look
upon them rather as ornamental additions than
as serviceable instruments in agriculture, or as
means of warfare ; certain it is that they are now
of little use to us, though they may defend the
utmost ends of the extremities against the

vicissitudes of temperature, or diminish the in-
tensity of the sense of touch. The nails naturally

divide themselves into three portions ; -that which
is immediately imbedded in the surrounding
integument, to which, from habit, we give the
name root ; the central portion, called the
body ; and the extreme end, which is called the
top. It is to be observed that in the toe
the centre strictly adheres to the subjacent tissue,
whilst the root is shut within two laminæ of the

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 169
skin, although it does not enter into immediate
contact with either of them. They appear to
belong to the epidermis, and to arise from it,
and they are totally devoid of all those vessels

and nerves which usually enter into the forma-
tion of organized matter ; if by any event the

epidermis is destroyed, the nails suffer with it,
and complete exfoliation occurs. I know not that
any of the circumstances connected with their
growth and development demands from me much
consideration ; I would only direct attention to
the necessity that exists of watching them, to
prevent the annoyances to which they give rise.
It is always necessary for those whose duty

calls upon them to watch over the proper deve-
lopment of the toes, to look to the healthy

expansion of the nail as the principal object of
their attention, after guarding against injudicious
pressure, for upon this depends much more of
the free exercise of the feet than might at first

X X

170 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

be imagined. If the nails are healthfully de-
veloped, they prevent much mischief to the tender

extremities of the toes, to which they form a
protecting shield. In our various positions of
life, the foot is necessarily the avant- coureur to
the rest of the frame, and is therefore more
exposed to accidents, to hurts, to bruises, than
any other portion of the body, and it often forms
a certain defence. It has been justly said, " that
a man without good toe nails is fit for nothing
in life, not even for an omnibus. " He who once
has had tender toes, and has found how much
he has to endure from such an exposure in a
public conveyance, will best find an answer to
such a question. A very slight injury to the toe,

divested of its natural protection, will cause ex-
treme pain, and even lock-jaw and death have

rapidly followed upon the wound of nerves which
have been thus exposed. The too rapid growth
of the nail may become a source of much incon-venience, more especially if the tendency be
laterally, when the neighbouring toe becomes the
sufferer ; it is of course a less inconvenience, if
instead of this the nail goes on increasing its
apex, but if it grows thus it is not without its
inconvenience ; sometimes it doubles itself up, or
grows backwards, or pushes itself into the lateral

flesh ; at others it splits, breaks, thickens, ex-
foliates ; indeed, when once a deviation has

begun, it is difficult to say what turn it may
take, and to what irregularity it may lead. The
growing into the flesh on the side is one of the
evils to which the great toe nail is especially
liable, although it sometimes from neglect occurs
even in the nails of the hands ; for all these
varied inconveniences the practitioner must be
prepared, and he must bear in mind that almost
every case requires a different mode of treatment,
and that it is quite out of the question to attempt
to lay down general laws ; in some instances

172 DISEASES OF THE FEET.
the consequence is but slight, whilst in others
dangers of no trifling importance may present
themselves. Inflammation will arise sometimes
of a serious aspect, for it is to be remembered
that in affections of the feet, however apparently
trifling, serious symptoms may set in, which
under ordinary circumstances would not occur.
It is not long since a nobleman-the late Earl
of Darnley—distinguished for his high state of
health, who had shown that his constitution
could withstand the ordinary shocks to which
man is liable, was a corpse in a few hours from
such a wound near the toe nail, as would have
passed unnoticed in the neighbourhood of the
vital parts of the frame.
The more striking affections of the nails
seem to depend upon a more rapid growth
than nature is capable of sustaining, or of such
alterations in their structure as leads to a change
in their constituent parts, or to their becoming

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 173

productive of mechanical injury to surrounding
tissues. In the first instance we find them
rapidly progressing, then splitting, cracking, or

exfoliating ; in the second, we observe them im-
perfectly formed, or subject to various diseases ;

and, in the third, they grow backwards, become

imbedded in the side, or lead to various de-
formities, which demand mechanical skill to cure

them. In both the first instances we have to

examine whether there may not be some con-
stitutional states which are productive of various

alterations in the economy, rendering the cases
much more difficult of treatment than they
otherwise would be. Of mechanical injuries,
which often cause the total loss of nail, there
is much to be considered ; but the nature of the
accident must entirely regulate the treatment, so
that it would be utterly impossible to lay down
general rules. The loss of the nail from a bruise,
from a burn, from exposure to cold, demands

Y Y

174 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

such exceedingly different treatment, that no
general laws could be laid down ; and to enter
into them particularly would demand a much
greater degree of minuteness than my limits
would possibly allow. In cold climates, even in

the north of Germany, so much will the tem-
perature affect the minute circulation through

the vessels of the extremities, that after many
hours' exposure to intense cold the nails will
be loosened from the epidermis, and come away
unchanged. The great object which should
always be had in view, under such circumstances,
is the reproduction of the nail ; and it is a
singular fact, that an annual growth and falling
off will often occur for several years, until at
last a permanent development takes place, when

they remain unchanged, and without any appa-
rent alteration in their shape and form. The

tendency to the reproduction of the nails is a
striking feature in their economy, and though

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 175

sometimes, where a loss of blood has originally
attended upon it, and such a seemingly morbific
action has been set up in the integuments, still

the effort of nature, assisted by art, has over-
come all difficulties, and led to their complete

re-establishment.
The periodical attention to the state of the
growth of the nails is what I would more
immediately insist upon, and I recommend
every one to find some person in whom he can
place confidence to inspect his feet feet two or
three times in the course of the year. However
attentive a man is to the cleanliness of his
person, however watchful over the occasional
paring his nails, yet alterations go on stealthily,
and creep upon him before he is aware that

there is the slightest deviation from the or-
dinary course. The extreme points of the feet

scarcely come within the scope of vision, and
few men can form a correct judgment for

176 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

themselves of what may be taking place ; they
are satisfied if they feel no inconvenience, and
flatter themselves that as things as have always
gone on well that they will do so always ; but
there are a variety of changes eternally taking
place in a man's person, of which he is the
last to be cognizant. He knows not that he
is growing older, that the system of to-day is
somewhat different from that of yesterday, and
that it is necessary to be on his guard for
I am recommending prevention ; I
am not now speaking of cure ; but this I
must say, that one-half of the maladies which
it has been my lot to have witnessed might
have been prevented had ordinary care been
taken. If alterations occur in the various
states and stages of human life, in features, in
the strength of the muscular system, in the
vigour of the senses, is it not likely that
the same change takes place in all the more
to-morrow.

----

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 177

minute circumstances of life ; and that in the
nails singular variations occur, the slightest
observation certainly proves. They are soft
in infancy, and tinged with red, whilst in
youth they have spots of white ; in later life
they assume a purple hue ; but look at them
after a fever, or after any severe trial of the
constitution, they have become soft and pale,
are thin at the top and at the edges, and
sometimes fall off.

*
Look at them in the
incipient consumption, their rapid growth, their
similarity to the beak of a bird. Again, observe
how they betray the blood that circulates in the
veins ! Not all the salt to be found in the
ocean would wash away the little black spot that
tells us the negro blood has at some time
or other been infused into the European. The
nails betray the secret, and the initiated is
often made acquainted through them with secrets
that he could by no other means have fathomed.
Z z

178 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

The great desideratum is to render the top of
the nail round, to prevent the sides growing into
the circumjacent flesh, and to keep the root
firmly and properly embedded in the folds of the
epidermis ; the spongy substance which shoots out
should be pressed down, taking care not to
remove it, for nature seems to have intended it
as a protection to the quick. The superfluous
skin requires to be taken away, and a regular
semicircle should be formed. The nails will
sometimes split in a manner that will require
the assistance of an experienced operator, for
external substances may add to the mischief,
and the simpler means will be of no avail ; and
it may become necessary to wear for some
days a guard, to prevent further mischief. If
the nails grow into the flesh, it will also be
generally necessary to have assistance, for the
irritation may be sufficient to excite inflammation,
which may run on to suppuration, or the forma-

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 179

tion of fungous excrescences, which are not so
easy of cure as may at first be conceived. The
nail must sometimes be cut down to the root.
Tearing the nails is a very bad practice, and
can never be required as long as a knife
or a pair of scissors can be obtained ; pain,
heat, and much irritation often follow upon

this thoughtless proceeding, which would be ne-
cessarily avoided if that regularity of attention

which I would strongly inculcate were perse-
vered in. The loosened nail-the false nail, as

it is termed demands more care than it
generally receives. It would be useless for me
to enter upon the treatment, for the cases
vary very much, two being scarcely alike, and
demand varied treatment ; generally, however,
cutting carefully and tenderly away all diseased
portions, and separating the growing nail from
the subjacent skin, is required. The whitlow
is a disease which sometimes assumes a very

180 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

serious character, and is dependent upon in-
attention to the state of the nails, under

which a swelling takes place ; abscess is
formed, the serum of which is of a singular
character, becoming highly acrid, sometimes
even corroding the periosteum , and acting
upon the bones SO as to produce caries.

Sometimes great constitutional disturbance ac-
companies them ; the glands sympathize and

become painfully tumid. The treatment then
must be decisive ; the serous fluid must be
evacuated by the lancet before it has had

time to burrow deeply ; leeches have been re-
commended, but they seldom are serviceable ;

cold lotions , and applications of the preparation
of lead, are required to the fingers.

It may
be generally concluded that, when they make
their appearance, there is a want of tone
which can only be imparted by medical advice
and attention to diet.

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 181

CHAPTER VIII.

CHILBLAINS are the maladies of youth, and
sometimes more difficult to be borne than evils
which affect us at a later period. Endurance
and philosophy are the results of experience,
and we quietly submit to affections which
are beyond the reach of art. This pest of
youth is a source of much greater pain than
we are aware of, for even those who have
most acutely suffered, forget, as objects crowd
upon their memory, the severe trials of their
early life, the tears they have shed, the itching

they have endured, the throbbing, the burn-
ing, the miseries of the sleepless night pro-
3 A

182 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

duced in the school day by those inveterate
foes to ease and tranquillity-chilblains. These
tumors, marked by all the characters which
have been shown to belong to inflammation ,
are most painfully felt in early life, when,
from the activity of the circulation, the minutest
artery of the integument becomes injected with
blood ; each nerve, however minute, is pressed
upon, and the distension of the tissue is such
that it is almost insupportable.

Then comes

the venous retardation, with all its concom-
itant evils , and ulcerations of the most fear-
ful kind arise. Although some of the most sen-
sitive parts of the body -such as the lips, ears,

nose, and hands, may become the seat of chil-
blains, I have solely to consider them as affecting

the feet, and it is upon the toes or upon the

heels that they are more generally found, assum-
ing a variety of appearances, which, from their

familiarity to the greater mass of people, I need

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 183
not enumerate. Sufficient for me is it to remark,
that on their first appearance they are evidently
tumors, to which there is a large determination
of arterial blood, evidenced by the throbbing,
the heat, and by the reddish inflammatory tint ;
they then become surcharged with venous blood,
daily do they become of a darker and purpler

hue, troublesome and insupportable itching suc-
ceeding to pain ; after which another stage is per-
ceptible, when the accumulated blood attempts to

throw off a portion of its serous substance, when
new and more violent throbbings and pulsations
arise, then the epidermis is separated from the
tissues beneath, and large or small vesicles are
formed, into which an acrid liquor is poured,
by whose agency the superincumbent skin is burst,
and irregular ulcerations are produced, which,
being most extensive, involve every part of the
foot, and even at last the bones themselves
become the prey to disease. Throughout the

184 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

whole history of the disease, the physiologist
is enabled to trace the efforts made by
nature to relieve herself from the aggravated

character of the inflammation, and the phy-
siologist could not select a better subject to

prove the inherent anxiety of each part of the
system to relieve itself from the dangers with

which it is threatened. The stages of the affec-
tion are strongly marked, and the remedies for

each are well indicated. At the same time it is
a matter of regret that they have been neglected
even by the most observant surgeons ;
and
means have been had recourse to in one stage
unsuccessfully, which, had they been taken when
absolutely required, would have been at once
useful and proper. The chilblain, if duly

watched, is very easy of cure, and much suf-
fering to the most helpless part of the com-
munity would be spared if a little attention

were paid. Indeed, a school in which chil-

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 185
blains are allowed to run to a certain stage
must be badly regulated, and there must be

neglect in a department of the utmost import-
ance in the economy of education. For it is

not the mind alone which is to be rendered

excellent, the body must meet with its due atten-
tion, and deformity of the one will soon tend

to the debility and destruction of the other.
It is to be regretted that in schools there
is SO much carelessness as to the state of
young people committed to the charge of persons
who, however anxious they may be as to the
progress of the mind, forget that the body has
its claims to watchfulness and attention . At
the coming on of the winter every parent and
instructor should take care that the clothing be
properly adapted to the wants of the young, -
warm stockings and thick gloves more especially
should be provided. Sudden transitions from
heat to cold should be guarded against ; ablution
3 B

186 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

with warm water should be followed by gentle fric-
tion ; wet shoes ought always to be quickly changed ;

gentle exercise should be insisted upon ; dancing
ought to be encouraged, and more especially
at home, where neither change of dress nor
sudden exposure to heat or cold are likely to
be encountered, whilst the dance upon the carpet
is preferable to the bare boards which the ball
room offers. The occasionally rubbing the feet
with eau de Cologne, aromatic vinegar, or brandy
properly diluted, will be found very serviceable.
With such attention chilblains may be altogether

kept off, even where there is a strong predispo-
sition to them ; but these precautions are not

to be followed only for a short time and then
forgotten, they are to be persevered in with
punctuality and determination. Twice in each
week an examination should be made, and if
there be a tendency to inflammation, lotions
consisting of camphor mixture, lotions of acetate

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 187

of ammonia, of diacetate of lead, and of
those sedative applications which are ordinarily
employed for the resolution of inflammation,

avoiding all narcotic sedatives, for their ex-
ternal application is more prejudicial than

advantageous. Sea water, or а solution of
salt, will sometimes be productive of great
good ; astringent washes of zinc, and of alum,
may also be used. In the second stage, and
during the retardation of the venous blood,
stimulants are required ; and we find turpentine,
liquor ammonia, cantharides, adapted for them.
Previous to this leeches may be used, but I am
not an advocate for their employment without
due consideration, for in many instances they

do not act as in general cases of local in-
flammation ; for there is again a very rapid

influx of blood into the capillary vessels, besides
which there is often an intolerable itching left
behind, which keeps up a fearful state of irri-

188 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

tation. The production of cold, by the evapora-
tion of ether, by the use of spirit, or the

immediate application of ice, not only gives

temporary relief, but permanent, if it be per-
severed in for some time ; compresses, dipped

in cold lotions, should be unremittingly kept
upon the part affected until the redness, heat,
and swelling have disappeared. The warm
fomentations, such as decoctions of poppies, of
chamomile flowers, of turnips, are occasionally
successful, but I by no means recommend them,
for I have been uniformly successful in the
removal of chilblains in their inflammatory stage
by means of cold lotions.
When ulceration has taken place we shall find
that much more difficulty arises than could have

been suspected, and very quickly will the constitu-
tion sympathize, if we are not able to check its

progress. We must first enjoin absolute rest ;
the horizontal position must be maintained, and

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 189

any exposure to heat or to cold avoided, all the
applications which science has discovered will be

useless without these primary regulations. Emol-
lient cataplasms, sedative liniments, are in the

first instance necessary for the alleviation of pain.
We then must have recourse to such measures
as the particular case may require ; sometimes
gentle stimulants, at other times more active
ones, are pecessary ; we have in the first instance
cantharides, ammonia, nitrate of silver, to depend
upon ; in the second, camphorated lotions, the
balsams, mustard ; but it is not requisite I should
enter into details, for they must so much depend

upon the precise nature of the affection. The re-
gimen must be most cautiously watched, for the

local applications will be hardly serviceable unless
the diet be abstemious, and the system properly
regulated. It is only now and then that I am
called upon to witness those deplorable cases,
which were so common in former days, where
3 C

190 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

mortification rapidly advanced, where bark, where

antiseptics, were absolutely necessary ; for, fortu-
nately for the human race, these evils have nearly

disappeared, at least amongst the classes of society
which I am most commonly called on to attend.
The humblest classes are by the watchfulness of
nature generally free from the disorder in the
worst stages, for their feet become hardened by
the exercise they take, by their exposure to the

vicissitudes of weather, and their superficial cover-
ings are generally so thickened and hardened as

to free them from the evils to which the more deli-
cate are exposed. We now seldom see constitutions

so tainted as to yield to chilblains, and to be
SO exhausted as to be almost incapable of
assisting art in healing them ; for, with proper
attention, we are now enabled to meet every case
that presents itself, and although some little

time may be demanded, we are generally suc-
cessful. Oftentimes, indeed, there is a greater

DISEASES OF THE FEET. 191

prolongation of time for cure than satisfies the
anxieties of friends. This, however, is the case
where there is some constitutional taint where

there is a scrofulous diathesis. This state of ill-
health was, I understand, formerly much more

prevalent in England than it now is. Medical
treatment in early life, good food, and proper
clothing, have had a

material influence upon
it ; and I am too happy to say that cases such
as are described by the older surgical authors,
now rarely make their appearance.
The gangrene, or mortification of the chilblain,
is the separation of the part which dies from
the living portion by a process which nature sets
up for the purpose of protecting herself from
infection. The stages are beautifully defined
from the moment when sensibility gradually is
lost to that when fresh substance is formed, -
the changes of the tint of the flesh from brown

to a black or livid green, the line of demar-
cation between the morbid portion and the

192 DISEASES OF THE FEET.

organized circle of life by which it is sur-
rounded, are strikingly visible, and the remedial

agents which are to be employed must be
strictly adapted to the efforts of nature. The
system throughout is to be supported ; proper
local applications must stimulate the torpid
powers, and every circumstance must be duly
and thoroughly attended to. The application
of charcoal, of the chlorurets of lime and of
soda, the use of bark, of steel, of wine, of
opium, must be the general remedial agents ;
nor must we expect that we can at once check
the progress of the complaint, for when once the
mortification has commenced, it will run its
general course, the only duty of the medical
man being to watch the indications of nature,
and to be enabled to render her that assistance
which she may require, always bearing in mind
neither to be too meddlesome nor too indolent
in our treatment, the happy art being to steer
between the two extremes.

THE HAND. 193

CHAPTER IX.

THE hand becomes next the object of my
examination. It will be remembered that the
Earl of Bridgewater left by his will, in the
year 1825, eight thousand pounds to be given
to such person or persons who would write
works illustrative of the power, wisdom, and

goodness of God, as manifested in the Crea-
tion ; and amongst the points selected was the

construction of the hand of man. The Pre-
sident of the Royal Society appointed the late

Sir Charles Bell to write the treatise, which
he did, under the title of " The Hand, its
Mechanism and vital Endowments, " as evincing

3 D

194 THE HAND.

design, and for which he received one thousand
pounds. He published it in 1837. To those
who are familiar with the anatomical writings of
that distinguished professor, there is less of novelty
than to the public at large, for we perceive
throughout it the same train of reflection which
he has given us in his three volumes of anatomy,
and in his papers upon the nervous system, read
before the Royal Societies of London and of

Edinburgh. It would be a matter of presump-
tion on my part to attempt to discuss the opinions

of one who, familiar with physiology and com-
parative anatomy, has entered into a philosophic

inquiry into the physical properties, the mechanical
construction, and the singular endowment of this
most important organ of the human frame. I
must confine my own observations to the means
by which it may be enabled to carry out the
objects, not for which it was originally designed ,
but for which, according to the customs and

THE HAND. 195

manners of polished society, it is to be employed.
It is not for me to examine it, as the organ
by which so many important actions are to be
performed. It is not as covered with the coarse
skin which enables the operator to perform so
many manipulations, with a hardened cuticle
which prevents too much sensibility, or with nails
capable of grasping objects, it is as covered with
a delicate epidermis, with soft integuments under
it, for the purpose of increasing the power of
sensation, and for that delicacy of touch which
affords pleasure, and the capability of receiving
transient impressions. Attention to the state of
the skin of the hands, to the nails, and to the
formation of the fingers, is rarely given at that
time of life when the system is developing itself ;
and yet there is much more necessity for it
than we are willing to allow ; upon their
management much of the power of the artist
depends. The painter, the sculptor, who has

196 THE HAND.

pliable and flexible hands, who has delicacy of

touch, and quickness of sensation, will be supe-
rior to him who has the greater power of

conception and of invention . The organization
of the hand may be perfect as to its muscular
power, may be endowed with a high degree of
elasticity ; but if, besides this, there is not all that
can be given to it, by unremitting watchfulness
of defects, by constant cleanliness, and careful
preservation of the skin and nails, not only will
there be clumsiness in action, but there will be
imperfection in the sensation and in the power
of construction. There are occupations in life
which are entirely dependent upon the sensibility
of the nerves of touch, yet how little are those
who follow them aware that, by attention and
management, they are either to be heightened or
diminished.
The same dermoid coverings which exist in
the foot and the rest of the human body are

THE HAND. 197

found extended over the whole of the hand,
modified according to the circumstances in which
each individual is placed. The epidermis has
the same functions to perform ; it is the guard
and protector of the subjacent tissue, and is
thick or thin, according to the uses which are

made of the hand. In some persons it is ex-
quisitely soft and thin, conveying the sensation

of touch with rapidity and intensity ; in others,
it is remarkably thick and hard, and capable of
resisting external impression. This apparatus,
too , differs according to the sensibility of the
different parts of the hand. At the tops of the
fingers, there are minute spiral ridges, having
depressed lines, which are also marked in the
under surface, and in these are lodged the
extreme ends of nerves, formed into a pulpy
mass. At the verge of the finger is situated

the nail, a continuation of the cuticle, of ex-
cessive thickness, formed into a fold ; its

3 E

198 THE HAND.

origin has been a subject of much discussion,
some persons entertaining the belief that it
is a condensation of the rete mucosum ; and
it is by it, as I have before observed, that we
are enabled, by means of the tinge of black
which remains from generation to generation,
to ascertain whether any negro blood flows
through the veins of an individual. In the
West Indies and in the United States, where
there is great discrimination of what is called
a taint in the blood, the proof is supposed to
be decisive if the root of the nail exhibit the
slightest approximation to a dark hue. The
epidermis permits the perspiration to exude
through it, and has a very striking influence

in rendering the body cool or warm ; the per-
spiration is of considerable importance to the

state of health, and the skilful physician draws
his indications of the health or disease of an
individual from its state. A warm hand, even

THE HAND. 199

if covered with a gentle dew, is necessary in
some climates, whilst the cold clammy moisture
is to be avoided. In winter, the caloric is rapidly
absorbed by the atmosphere, and cold generated
throughout the whole of the body. If the

hand be not properly protected, and if the vas-
cular surface under the epidermis be deprived

of its proper heat, sensation is lost ; that state
of numbness is produced which not only has
an influence upon the muscular fibre but upon
the secretions of the body, some of which are
rapidly diminished, whilst others, on the other
hand, are inordinately increased.
If on the one hand roughness of the cuticle
on the palm of the hand and the fingers is to
be avoided, so likewise is too much delicacy. We

are sometimes rendered insensible to the smooth-
ness of some surfaces, for by the great smoothness

of the skin we are unable to grasp objects with
firmness. Fortunately, however, the habits of society

200 THE HAND.

do not demand the steady and decisive grasp

which the mechanic and the labourer find essen-
tially necessary in their occupations.

There is,
generally speaking, too little attention paid to
the state of the hands and fingers ; all that is
thought of is cleanliness, and an occasional
paring of the nails ; but it would be as well if,
from an early period, care was taken of the
manner of the development of the hands, so that
they may acquire beauty of shape, flexibility,
and muscular power. The shape of the fingers
will be found materially to influence the sense
of touch ; they should be rendered tapering,
whilst the extreme end must, in the lower
part, be allowed a full development, so that
a sort of soft cushion may exist, formed
of the sentient nerves, covered over with a
fine elastic epidermis. This organization is
necessary for the acuteness of touch, whilst
the nails should be firm and hard shields

THE HAND. 201

for the upper surface : the healthy state of
the membrane is to be preserved by constant
ablution, by the occasional use of sand soap,
by gentle friction with the flesh brush, by
gloves properly adapted to the warmth or
cold of the weather, and by the occasional
passing the hand frequently through the air,

as in fanning. Nothing can be more in-
jurious than the system which has been

recommended for the purpose of producing a
temporary whiteness and delicacy of the hand
and arm, and which consists in holding the
arm in an upright position for a considerable
length of time, and even, as it has been
asserted, of tying them in that position for
hours. It is true that the cuticular circulation
is for a time checked in the very minute
branches of the vascular system, but it soon
returns, and there is often a venous blueness

produced by the reaction, infinitely more dis-
3 F

202 THE HAND.

agreeable to the eye than the redness which
was complained of. Many cosmetics cosmetics have
been tried, but with little or no good effect,
and they sometimes have been productive of
mischief, more especially those which have been
composed of preparations of lead, for whatever

may be asserted by chemists as to the harm-
lessness of some of the compounds of that

metal, there are many instances on record
of irretrievable paralysis produced by them,
and more especially where the epidermis has
been removed.
The nails are to be watched from an early
period of youth, by those parents who are
anxious to do their duty to their families, and
it is a subject of much regret that at schools
they are so constantly neglected. I would not
have a boy effeminate oror a coxcomb, but he
should be instructed in those little duties that
render his future life more agreeable to him, and

THE HAND. 203

that at last grow into habits, which become of
importance to him when old age, with all its want
of comforts, creeps on.

The nails are never to be
bitten or torn off, they are to be kept free from
all sort of dirt and sordes, whose accumulation
blocks up the termination of the nerves, impedes
a free circulation of the blood, and thus impairs
the sense of touch, if not the general health.
The free transpiration through the skin is often
impeded by inattention to the nails. What the
connexion between the nails and the diseases of
the human system depends upon, it is not for me
to explain, that I must leave to the pathologist ;
but every attentive observer of nature is aware
that there is some latent communication. The
consumptive patient exhibits the peculiar state of
nail by which the physician knows that the lungs
are affected ; nay, nosologists have taken it as
one of their characteristic marks of the worst
stage of phthisis. A child who has a scrofulous

204 THE HAND.

habit will have such brittle nails that they will
break before they attain any strength. The red
deeply tinged nail is found concomitant with
gout ; the blue, with asthma ; in some fevers they
become pale and thin. In the cold stage of an
intermittent fever they almost seem shrivelled
up, whilst in the hot they are larger than
ordinary. It therefore becomes the bounden
duty of all to be attentive even to those minutia

which escape observation generally. It is use-
less for me to attempt to determine the exact

length to which the nail should be suffered to
grow, but I would recommend that a certain day
be fixed in each week for attention to them ; such
regularity is always attended with great advantages,
the system acquires as it were a periodicity,
besides which it is remembered, and comes into
the usual economy of life. Where this is the

case, too, there will never be those ragged in-
teguments, which are oftener the source of mischief

THE HAND. 205

than is believed, for by simply covering a

denuded spot by common court-plaster, absorp-
tion will be prevented. The nail brush should

frequently be used, and the removal of any

extraneous matter be managed by blunt instru-
ments, for knives and pointed scissors are likely

to wound and irritate the sentient extremities ;
and besides this, the nail is not unfrequently so
loosened, that it does not retain its proper hold
in the rest of the integuments.
Accustomed to so many of the phenomena of
life as we are, some of the most extraordinary
pass by us completely unnoticed, because our
minds are more engrossed with those which
seem to be the most difficult to understand.
The performance of a young child upon the

pianoforte is an object of such daily occur-
rence that we are not

emotions of surprise or

struck with any
admiration ; yet a

moment's reflection would show us what nu-
3 G

206 THE HAND.

merous duties the nerves, the muscles, and
the mind are called upon at the same moment
to perform. The eye must seize with rapidity
all the variations of notes, time, and rhythm,
whilst the fingers must strike the keys with
instantaneous motion. There must be a perfect
correspondence between the intellect and the
muscular power ;; the ear must also be alive
to every modification of sound ; yet there
must appear no labour, no hurry, no difficulty.
Sensibility the most delicate is alive to every
want of consonance of mind and body. The
training the hand to this obedience demands,
in many instances, much time, whilst some
seem to have an intuitive power of expressing
harmony, they have a natural gift by which,
in the most orderly and systematic manner,
they command the instrument on which they
play. It is not for me to enter upon the
field which more immediately belongs to the

THE HAND. 207

professor of music, but I would observe that
in the greater number of instances there is
too little attention paid to the shape and
form of the fingers and thumb of individuals
their power of expansion, of action, their
flexibility, and their elasticity.

Some young
persons are called upon to use muscular power
of which they are incapable. They have
placed before them pieces of music, admirably
adapted, doubtless, for the gigantic grasp of
some artist who has devoted his life to his
art ; but instructors are forgetful of the utter
impossibility of stretching the muscles, ignorant
of the tendons which are called into play, or
the fascia that prevents the effort from being

carried into execution. I would strongly re-
commend every parent and guardian, and

certainly every superintendent of a school, to
become familiar with the general anatomy of
the hand, to learn what form and configuration

208 THE HAND.

prevent a child from making such progress as
the eager ambition of fond parents may desire.
Not only do they look for impossibilities, but
they may be the cause of the production of
future mischief. The hand may lose much
of its natural power ; nay, be so harassed by

vain efforts as to become incapable of per-
forming many of the offices required. Writing

may become so painful as to be almost aban-
doned ; besides which, upon the slightest

exertion fatigue will supervene. The weakness
of wrist so often complained of amongst ladies
may not unfrequently be traced to the undue
muscular exercise in early life.
Whilst each of the fingers plays its part in
the general economy, serving to give flexibility,
tenacity, firmness, and strength to the hand,
the thumb is in itself an instance of wondrous
workmanship, which exhibits that everything
has been designed for the use of man, with a

THE HAND. 209

providential care for his well- being.

Being
placed in immediate opposition to the fingers,
it is enabled to assist them in holding and
grasping objects. It renders the hand more
powerful, more useful, than the claws, the hoofs,
the horns, the talons, the spurs, and the beaks
of other created beings ; and as our venerable
naturalist Ray has observed, " Man hath none
of all these, but is weak and feeble, and sent
unarmed into the world : -why, a hand, with
reason to use it, supplies the use of all these. "
The various directions in which the thumb acts
gives to it power in the different purposes
of life ; it is of exceeding strength, and rolls
widely and freely. Its tendons and joints,
together with its peculiar bursa, are all most
ingeniously contrived, and enable us as well
to exert power in heaving an anchor or delicacy
in picking up a needle. It is, of all the
organs we possess, the one we most frequently

3 H

210 THE HAND.

call into action, and the one which seems less
liable to fatigue. Not only are all the labours
of man dependent on it-for neither could he
dig, nor spin, nor plant, nor weave without it
-but those intellectual occupations which form
the source of his superiority must altogether
cease. The pen is guided by the incessant
motion of this little agent, which has conveyed
from age to age the learning of the wise and
the good, and diffused a knowledge of all that
has been observed. Of the hand we do not
avail ourselves, as do some of the nations of
the globe, for assistance in speech. Quintilian
has, in a few powerful words, expressed the
uses to which the Romans applied the hand.
He says :-" Other parts assist the speaker, but

these, if I may use the expression, speak them-
selves ; by these we demand, we promise, we

call, we dismiss, we threaten, we supplicate, we
hate, we fear ; joy, sorrow, doubt, confession,

THE HAND. 211

repentance, sufficiency, plenty, number, time, we
show. " At this day both the Roman and the
Neapolitan are remarkable for their gestures ;
whole conversations pass, games are played, and
the varying passions delineated by the thumb
and the fingers. Their expressive countenances
oftentimes speak less than do these organs. They
seem to be enabled to convey every idea that
flashes across the mind ; and whether he who
accomplishes his end, or he who comprehends
the ever-varying motion, be the most ingenious,
it is most difficult to understand.
The thumb is so essentially necessary to the
power of man, that were it wanting he would be
incapable of following any of those pursuits in

which he is engaged ; without that fleshy pro-
tuberance which rises on the last joint, he would

be almost helpless. The anatomist, once the
great leader of the schools of surgery, Albinus,
has characterized the thumb as a small hand, the

212 THE HAND.
assistant of the greater 66

manus parva majori adju-
trix." We may generally judge of the dexterity

of a man by the shape of his thumb, and the
pretended fortune-tellers are fully alive to this
fact when they pronounce,, on examining the
hand, the degree of superiority which a man has

attained as a workman. The coarseness or deli-
cacy of the skin, the shape of the fingers, and

the form of the thumb, indicate many circum-
stances which the inexperienced observer passes

over. The different length of the fingers is another
provision of nature ; it is absolutely necessary for
many of the manipulations that this should be the
case ; were it not so, the art of writing, which
has delighted us with the works of Byron, of
Walter Scott, or of a Schiller, a Goethe, a

Homer, or Milton, could not have been fol-
lowed ; for take the means of writing, the pen

grasped by the thumb and the indicator finger,
rests upon the very termination of the middle

THE HAND. 213

finger, which again receives support from the
other two fingers, so is it with every one of -
the fine arts, the brush could not be held by
the painter, nor the chisel by the sculptor, were
the fingers of an equal length.

But the nu-
merous illustrations of which the subject admits

must not now detain me ; my object is rather to
show that attention to what nature demands of
us should be more generally given than it is, and
that we should carefully learn the end and aims
of our great Artificer, because from them we
ascertain what is best to be done for the proper
health and due preservation of each part of the
human structure, and that we should be enabled
not only to counteract many deviations from a
normal state, but that we have it in our power to
render our original gifts more available, and thus by
early education and watchfulness we shall be enabled
to turn them to greater account, not only for our
own benefit, but for that of society at large.
3 I

214 THE HAND.
Various have been the cosmetics, washes,
tinctures, soaps, unguents, " et hoc genus omne, "
with which the learned as well as the unlearned
have tried to give a delicate whiteness to the
hands and arms ; few of these things possess
much value except as simple detergents, and as
keeping the surface from impurities, or gently
increasing the perspiration. Some of the common
vegetables, such as horse-radish, house- leek,
turnips, apples -have been recommended, either
in the form of cataplasm, or the juice extracted
from them ; and various are the recipes which
are found in the old herbalists, each of which

has some respectable authority for its employ-
ment. It would be useless for me to discuss

the subject, because although I have found
many very useful where there has been want of
attention, and various unseemly affections have
made their appearance under the form of
pimples, blotches, redness, scurf, yet each case
subject, because

THE HAND. 215

requires its own peculiar treatment, and often-
times the constitution is much in fault. A

very excellent wash is formed of the tincture
of Benjamin, in rose or in distilled water ; the
balsam of Peru, with yolk of egg, or mucilage
of gum arabic, in some instances sulphate of
zinc, oxide of bismuth, and others of the metallic
salts, may be judiciously employed ; but as none
of these are to be used without knowing the
exact state of the skin, I shall not enter into
details which cannot be fully borne out by the
experience which is necessary. A

temporary
whiteness of the hands ought not to be sought after,

because it is always followed by lasting deteriora-
tion of the skin. If by care and attention we

can obtain that which constitutes beauty, it is
both right and honourable to do everything that
lays within our power, but a mere transient effect
should not be produced, more especially when in
the greater number of instances it leads to mischief.

216 THE HAND.

I have pointed out the necessity of attention to the
proper coverings for the feet, and a few words
upon those of the hand may be admissible,
although there is not SO much dependent
upon them. Gloves should be worn according
to the state of the weather : a thin glove in
winter will be the cause of redness and of
discoloration, whilst a hot one in summer will

bring with it increased perspiration and erup-
tions. Those lined with lamb's wool and warm

materials, which are SO efficient in December,
will be quite out of the question in August.
The best material for gloves at all times is silk ;
less so, however, in the midst of summer. The
soft leather gloves are well known to be preferable
to all others, and therefore I will only further
say, that a change of the materials of gloves
occasionally is of great service. Many incipient

eruptions and discolorations vanish upon substi-
tuting for a few days different gloves from those

THE HAND. 217

which have been generally worn, and a change
of temperature being superinduced, relieves the

system also from many of those temporary in-
conveniences arising from an alteration in the

state of the perspiration ; it is not for me to
point out the varieties which present themselves ;
the subject would occupy a vast deal more space
than I can give it, and fortunately the best works
in surgery may be consulted by those who are
desirous to pursue the subject further. My great
desire is to impress upon the minds of
mothers and guardians the importance of an
early attention to the comforts of the young ;
for by such means will the worst cases be
avoided. Having promised ( page 17 ) to give,
in an Appendix, a brief view of the anatomy

of the human foot, I have added a con-
cluding chapter, taken from the " Practical

Exposition of the Human Foot, " written by
me some time since.

3 K

APPENDIX.
FROM THE

PRACTICAL EXPOSITION OF THE HUMAN FOOT.

CHAPTER X.

THE structure of the human foot is exceedingly
beautiful, and well worthy the study of all who
love to watch the never-ending wonders of our
fabric, each of which seems to have been framed
to lead us on to further inquiries. Whenever
we examine anatomically any apparatus, and
study for what the different contrivances are

manifestly intended, we are struck with the sim-
plicity even of apparently the most complicated

arrangements. We see that were the organ dif-
ferently made, it could not adapt itself to

all the purposes for which it is destined. That
thirty-six bones and that thirty-six joints should

3 L

222 PRACTICAL EXPOSITION

enter into the composition of the human foot
seems at first to be too bounteous a gift, and
that the very number of parts of which such a
machine is composed would lead to constant
derangements, whilst at the same time all that

is performed could be effected at a less expendi-
ture of mechanism ; but were the foot formed

of one solid bone, however capable it might be
of supporting the human body, it would be
devoid of that flexibility, elasticity, freedom, and
power which give ease of motion, capability of
exertion, and elegance of gait to man. The
whole fabric of these bones and of these joints
is singularly instructive. Each joint unites two
bones in such a manner that they are not in
immediate contact, each articulating surface is

covered with elastic cartilage ; its surface is per-
fectly smooth, being lubricated by an oily fluid

called the synovia, covered over by a delicate
membrane, extending from bone to bone. This

OF THE HUMAN FOOT. 223

covering or capsule has external to it a strong
ligament attached from point to point of each

bone, binding them firmly together without im-
peding in any way their motion. Such numerous

joints cannot fail to give a degree of flexibility
to the bones which could in no other way be
obtained ; and were the invention of the most

ingenious of men to be ransacked for the pur-
pose of discovering any more perfect contrivance,

I am persuaded that it could not approach at
the longest interval the machine destined for such
a variety of motions and of actions. Whilst the
junction of the foot to the bones of the leg
demands the most minute inquiry to estimate the
beauty of the contrivances which have been

carried out, I will for the present moment con-
fine myself to the osteological anatomy of the

foot, describing the thirty-six bones of which it
is formed and their various connexions with each
other.

224 PRACTICAL EXPOSITION
It has been very properly observed that the foot
is the true basis on which our whole machine is
supported, and that a sculptor would be working
in vain were he to rest his statue on a round
and movable foundation ; it would undoubtedly

fall and be broken to pieces. In order to illus-
trate the wonderful mechanism of the foot, its

muscles, tendons, and its bones, it would be but
necessary to mark the evolutions on the toe of
one of our celebrated dancers, and observe how
the pirouette is performed. The preservation of

perpendicularity, of a graceful equilibrium, a pic-
turesque attitude, and a classic arabesque, are to

be combined with energetic execution and mus-
cular strength, whilst the whole body is re-
volving round upon the toe. A pirouette, to be

elegantly performed, requires the dancer to turn
round not only on one leg, but upon two toes,
without the slightest jerk of the body, several
times. Not only must there be an unshaken

OF THE HUMAN FOOT. 225

equilibrium, but the position of the arms must be
so managed as to maintain the line of gravity with
gracefulness. The imitation of some of the statues
of antiquity shows what dependence on anatomical
structure dancers must have. Of these the most
striking is the representation of “ Mercury new
lighted on a heaven-kissing hill. " Unless the foot
is perfectly formed this is impossible. The body
leans forward, supported entirely on the toe of the
foot ; the leg that is in attitude must be bent ;
the right arm is elevated in the air ; the left,
stretched out, holds the caduceus ; the whole frame
is rapidly revolved ; the movement must appear

perfectly natural and unconstrained, every appa-
rent effort to counterpoise the body spoils the

whole effect. The dancer has to expand all his
toes to make them as it were roots, which hold
him to the spot ; if he does not do so, his foot
loses its natural appearance, a wavering motion
is produced, which results from the convexity of

3 M

226 PRACTICAL EXPOSITION

the toes, vacillation occurs, the equilibrium is
lost, and the whole performance is ridiculous.
But however flexible the joints of the foot have
become by the constant practice of the dancer,
and the freedom of motion may almost equal
that of the hand, it does not add to the
beauty of the gait in common walking ; on the

contrary, we are astonished sometimes to ob-
serve the tottering steps of the dancer whom

we have admired on the stage, and whilst
we learn of what the human machine is
capable, we do not recommend its education
to unnatural positions and useless deviations from

its ordinary actions. The foot is so to be regu-
lated that a steady, graceful movement and

carriage of the body are the results, and for
the ordinary exercise, strength, and flexibility ;

these cannot exist where there is any mecha-
nical impediment arising out of those altera-
tions of structure, which it is the duty of

OF THE HUMAN FOOT. 227

the Chiropodist to watch over and to prevent.
It would appear almost absurd to recommend the
general reader to observe the beautiful display
made in the ballet by the accomplished dancer,
but any one who wishes to become familiar

with the structure which Nature has so harmo-
niously and exquisitely framed will find in dancing

on the stage the finest illustrations. The steps,
the motions, the attitudes, exhibit in the utmost
perfection the capabilities of the muscular system.
The enjoyment which is to be derived from
the display of grace and elegance will be much
heightened by the study of the anatomical
structure which admits of it. It is the subjection
of the foot, the legs, the arms, and the body,
to certain and definite rules, that constitutes
greatness in the art. Doubtless the ars saltationis
of the Romans was but leaps, tumbling, and
grotesque exertions of the limbs and the body.
Extravagant contortions, uncouth motions, and

228 PRACTICAL EXPOSITION

unmeaning attitudes have long been banished
from the schools of art, and in their place we
have a systematic arrangement of every part of
the body in strict harmony, and in accurate

unison with the cadence of time and the ac-
companying music. The nobler works of the

painter and the sculptor are studied, -groups
such as those which have emanated from the
most inventive genius, are placed before us. To
Italy, the birthplace of all that is captivating
in art, we are indebted for the ballet as it is
at present before us, and we acknowledge that
it is invested with a character which renders
it not unworthy the most civilized nations.
Noverre was the first dancer who attempted to
improve the principles and powers of the art,
by writing a treatise containing instructions
which every aspirant to greatness in that art
should read. Nor were the philosophers who
wrote the French Encyclopædia unmindful of

OF THE HUMAN FOOT. 229

the influence which dancing has upon a polished
nation. Blasis has since that time given to the
amateurs and professors of the art a work full
of sensible observations on its theory and its
practice. He has shown what many and what
varied qualities are necessary to form a perfect
dancer ; and he has forcibly dwelt upon the
attention which should be paid, by each person
anxious to excel, upon the peculiarities which
mark his formation. He has shown that the
defects of different persons, whilst they may
altogether prohibit their venturing on one class
of performance, may be so managed as to
become the source of excellence in another.
The make of a person must be studied, the
natural construction of his legs and his feet
must be carefully observed, for some are SO
faulty that any attempt to remedy or relieve
the defects would be useless, whilst others again
have every external qualification, but want

3 N

230 PRACTICAL EXPOSITION

the discretion and the taste to develop them.
In the different animals inferior to man great
is the variety displayed in the formation of the

foot. Each family has its own marked character-
istic organ, admirably suited to the part he has

to play in the great theatre of the world ; the
mechanism is infinitely varied, and its adaptation
for the wants of the animal is always most
appropriate. The foot of the horse, the camel,
the elephant, has each its own peculiarities,
enabling the animal to fulfil the duties which
man requires of him ; and each seems to exhibit

in its structure that he was created to be sub-
servient to a higher being, and to supply his

wants and his desires. The more comparative
anatomy is studied the more evident is it that
the upright figure of man is dependent upon
his conformation, and that no animal approaches
him in that most striking of his characteristics.
The formation of his pelvis, the obliquity of the

OF THE HUMAN FOOT. 231

neck of the thigh-bone, the distances of the
trochanters from the sockets, the large muscles
of the loins and hips, all are associated with
the form of the foot. The Simia Troglodytes,
or Chimpanzee, an example of which whilst
living was in the Zoological Gardens, and
whose skeleton may now be studied in the
Museum, comes nearer to the human species
than any other being ; but it is evident that
only for a very short space of time could he
sustain the erect position. The deviations from
the structure of other skeletons visible in the

Marsupial family are well worthy investiga-
tion ; for we find that there are singularities of

formation which enable it to rest in the per-
pendicular, but this is done by the assistance

of its tail, on which, together with its paws, it
balances itself as on a tripod. With these two
exceptions all animals bend, at all times prone
to the earth, and this arises from that con-

232 PRACTICAL EXPOSITION

formation which should be thoroughly examined
to learn the cause of man's superiority.

to
The foot of the horse forms a most interesting
study as a piece of mechanism. What strength,
what power, what elasticity, are there combined !
The bones, the ligaments, and the hoof, have
configurations adapted for their use which have
now very properly been investigated by the
veterinary surgeon, who " finds each time he
demonstrates the anatomy something

admire." This subject, which is so much neg-
lected by the surgeon, is considered of import-
ance by the veterinary professors, who have been

enabled to obtain a charter for a Royal College,
whilst the Chiropodist is looked down upon as
practising a branch almost illegitimate and
scarcely to be recognized amongst the auxiliary
branches of medicine.
The bones of the foot have their own peculiar
mechanical construction ; indeed, it has justly been

OF THE HUMAN FOOT. 233

observed, " that there is hardly a bone which
has not a constitution of its own, or a disposition
of material adjusted to its place and its use.
The heel bone, the shin bone, the vertebræ,
and the bones of the head, -all differ in their
mechanical construction. ” The great object
which seems to have been considered in the
anatomical structure of the foot is to give
perfect security during all the great exertions which
it is called on to make in the vast variety of
motion of which it is capable. It is equally
adapted for walking, for running, for leaping ;
it is formed for kicking, for grasping ; and there
are many offices it would perform were it not
in civilized society rendered of less use than it
is amongst a people living in a state of nature.
We shall find that so admirably has Nature
contrived her handiwork, that the form of each
bone of the foot, of which there are so many,
is exactly in unison with the motion to be
30

234 PRACTICAL EXPOSITION
performed, and that were any part or portion
actually different from what we find it, there
would be some impediment to the actions which
are necessary. The articulations of the bones,
too, are equally advantageous. The forms of
bones are also so contrived as best to suit the
origin and insertion of the various muscles, and
their strength and thickness vary according to
their relative position and bearing upon these
muscles. The constituents, too, of which these
bones are are formed is another proof, if more
were wanting, of singular wisdom in the
structure of the bones. The three principles—
membrane, phosphate, and cartilage-are SO
united, that no one is so predominant as to
overcome the peculiar characteristic of the other
material, but they altogether compose a fabric
whose properties are admirably adapted for the
machinery which is to be set into motion. If
we take advantage of comparative anatomy we

OF THE HUMAN FOOT. 235

are still more struck with the bony part of the
man's foot ; we see how the shape in each

animal tends to illustrate the power, the con-
dition, and the station which it holds in

creation. The apparatus with which each is
supplied is but such a change as best suits his
means of obtaining his food, of defending himself
against his enemies, or such motion as he
may be called on to make, whether flying or
creeping, swimming or burrowing. The geologist
can also throw much light on these inquiries, for
he finds beneath the surface of the earth remains
of extinct races, and a single bone may enable
him to judge of the size, the habits, and the
residence of the creature. The anatomy of

the bones of the foot I will now briefly de-
scribe, in order that my exposition may contain

that which may be found generally useful.
The instep, or tarsus, is composed of seven
bones of some size, irregularly shaped and short.

236 PRACTICAL EXPOSITION

These are so arranged as to form the strongest
support of the body a flexible or elastic arch.
The astragalus is the most striking of these
bones ; together with the bones of the leg, the
tibia, and the fibula, it forms the ankle joint.
It has a semicircular head forming a complete
pulley, whose circle is large ; its cartilage is well
lubricated, and rolls under the articulating surface
of the fibula and tibia, and the groove, from its
boat-like shape, into which it enters, is called
the scaphoid cavity. The attention of the
anatomist is directed to the articulating surfaces ;
its superior surface, or that which is connected
with the scaphoid cavity of the tibia ; the internal
articulating surface, with the malleolus internus,
or the protuberance of the inner ankle ; the
external articulating surface, with the extremity
of the fibula ; the inferior and anterior surface,
with the os calcis or heel bone ; the head or
anterior articulating surface, which enters into

OF THE HUMAN FOOT. 237

the concave part of the os naviculare, or sca-
phoid bone, a smooth surface resting on a portion

of ligament between the os calcis and the navi-
culare, a fossa dividing the inferior articulating

surface and a groove in which the capsular
ligament is placed. On the inside of the bone
is a rough protuberance destined for the deltoid
ligament. The os calcis or heel bone forms the
back part of the arch on which the body rests.
There is an irregular process on the projection

in the back which serves as the point of inser-
tion for the tendo Achilles, or, as it was formerly

called, the Chorda magna ; there are two surfaces
covered with cartilage, where it is connected with
the astragalus ; and another by which it is joined
with the os cuboides. On the inside there is a
concavity, under which the nerves, the vessels,
and the tendons pass forward to the foot ; on
the outer surface there is a groove, which conveys
the tendon of the peronous longus towards its
3 P

238 PRACTICAL EXPOSITION

insertion into the metatarsal bone of the great
toe and the cuneiform bone. There is a tubercle
internally, to which is attached the ligamentum
inter os calcis et naviculare. The os naviculare
has a concave surface to receive the head of
the astragalus, a flat side slightly irregular for
the three cuneiform bones, and a tubercle for
the ligament running between it and the OS
calcis. There are three bones, which, from their
wedge-like shape, are called cuneiform ; one of
these, much larger than the other, being the one

on which the great toe stands, is called os cunei-
forme magnum ; the one in the middle is the

smallest, and is called os cuneiforme minimum ;
the other, os cuneiforme medium ; the great toe
and the two next are in unison with them. The
os cuboides, so called from its cubical form, is
on the outer side of the third cuneiform bone,
and is articulated with the os calcis. There are
two surfaces at its anterior point, for two meta-

OF THE HUMAN FOOT. 239

tarsal bones ; and in its lower surface is a groove,
for the tendon of the peronous longus. It is
thrust in between the os calcis and the third
cuneiform bone, so as to form an arch within

an arch ; thus the firm and elastic arch is com-
posed, having ligaments to unite it, a lubri-
cating fluid, and every contrivance to render it

the most perfect piece of mechanism with which
we are acquainted.
The metatarsus is placed between the tarsus
and the bones which form the toes, and is
composed of five bones. The general structure
of these bones is that on their lower sides, where
are the tendons of the toes, they are flattened ;

that they have a ridge upon their upper sur-
face. Where they approximate to the tarsus,

they have broad square surfaces, whilst where
they are in contact with the first bones of the

toes, they have small heads, the extremities ter-
minate in round balls for insertion into the

240 PRACTICAL EXPOSITION

cavities of the first bones of the toes, and there
is a groove for the attachment of the capsule.
From the anterior extremities are processes for
the attachment of the lateral ligaments of the
joints, the particular distinctions of the metatarsal
bones are not very striking ; it is, however, to be
noticed, that the metatarsal bone of the great
toe is the shortest, that it has the appearance
of greater strength, and that it is largest at its
extreme head, whilst the metatarsal bone of the
second toe is the longest, the metatarsal bone
of the little toe has its head fitted to receive
the tendons of the peronous secundus and tertius
muscles. The composition of the tarsus and
the metatarsus is such that a double arch is
formed, upon which the great mobility of the
foot depends, and we have a steady basis upon
which the frame rests ; from the lowest point of
the heel to the ball of the great toe, there is
the arch of the sole ; the astragalus, resembling

OF THE HUMAN FOOT. 241

the keystone of the arch ; and this plays freely be-
tween the two bones, the os calcis and the os navicu-
lare ; then there is an arch from side to side, formed

by the os cuboides and the os cuniforme, and
then the tarsal bones form themselves into a
third arch ; thus have we three arches, of which
the bones that form them are closely wedged

together, but which, nevertheless, admit of flex-
ibility and elasticity, one arch extending the

length of the foot, another its breadth, whilst
the third is horizontal. The arch which the
mason looks upon as the most perfect form of
solidity in building, and of which the stones
properly wedged together are the constituent
parts, thus exists in the foot ; but beyond this,
each constituent part of that arch is capable of
motion, and as has been observed by one of our
highest anatomical authorities, " the foundations
of the Eddystone lighthouse are not laid on a

better principle ; but our admiration is more ex-
3 Q

242 PRACTICAL EXPOSITION
cited on observing that the bones of the foot
are not only wedged together like the courses

of stone for resistance, but that solidity is com-
bined with elasticity and lightness ; " the strong

ligaments which unite the bones give an extra-
ordinary degree of flexibility, allowing a free

play to every bone ; at the same time there is
no visible motion in any one of the joints, but
it is generally diffused throughout the whole, each
part enabling the foot to act as volition directs,
and to perform slow or rapid, cautious or firm ,
light or decided, movements.
There are six muscles attached to the foot,
whose office is that of extensors, and two of
flexor muscles ; four of the former lie on the
back part of the leg, two on the outside, whilst
the two flexors are situated on the forepart
of the leg. The gastrocnemius, the plantaris,
the soleus, and the tibialis posticus are the
four first ; the peronæus longus and brevis the

OF THE HUMAN FOOT. 243

two next ; whilst the tibialis posticus, and the

peronæus tertius are the flexors. The gastrocne-
mius is that muscle which forms the calf of the

leg, from the condyles of the femur it takes its
origin, having two large bellies, the innermost of
which is the largest, its tendon arising from the
back of the inner condyle, and it has also an
adhesion to the capsular ligament of the knee ;
its outer head is not so long, springing from
the outer condyle, the two different bellies run
close to each other, and meet in the middle of
the leg, where they unite firmly, forming a large
flat tendon, which, joining with the tendon of the
soleus, forms the large tendon called the tendo
Achilles, which is inserted into the great process
of the os calcis. The soleus has also two heads,
one having its origin from the head of the
fibula, the other from the tibia they unite, and
a large fleshy belly is formed. We shall find that
Douglas, the celebrated anatomist, considers these
two muscles as forming a quadriceps, or two

244 PRACTICAL EXPOSITION

muscles united with two heads, to which he
gives the name of extensor suralis. These muscles
are called into action in all the movements of
the leg. The plantaris has a fleshy origin from
the external condyle of the femur, and is also
attached to the capsular ligament of the joint ;
its tendon takes its course between the inner
head of the gastrocnemius and the soleus, and
attaches itself to the inner edge and fore part of
the tendo Achilles, with which it is inserted into
the os calcis . The peronæus longus arises partly
tendinous, partly fleshy, from the head of the
fibula, and along its ridge to nearly the ankle,
having also a small slip from the head of the
tibia. Its tendon commences above the middle
of the leg, runs down behind the outer ankle,
giving to it its form, it passes through a groove
in the os calcis, and is inserted in the great
cuneiforme bone, and in the metatarsal bone
of the great toe. This is a most important
muscle in the motion of the foot, and it is by

OF THE HUMAN FOOT. 245

its action that the most striking movements in
dancing are performed ; it enables the artiste
to stand upon her toes, and upon its healthy and
regular action depends the power of taking great
exercise ; the agility of the body is also mainly
owing to it. In some parts it is exceedingly
thick, immediately under the head of the os
cuboides, this is so remarkable as to wear the
resemblance of ossification . In its length it is
bound down by a strong ligamentous expansion.
The peronous brevis has its origin from the
ridge of the fibula, commencing about one-third
down ; the tendons of the peronous longus and
brevis accompany each other by the outer ankle,
and there the peronous brevis runs into its

separate groove, to be inserted into the meta-
tarsal bone of the little toe and the os cuboides.

The peronous tertius has its origin from the
lower half of the fibula ; its tendon goes under
the annular ligament, on the fore part of the
3 R

246 PRACTICAL EXPOSITION

os calci , to be inserted into the metatarsal
bone of the little toe. The tibialis posticus
arises from the back of the tibia from its ridge,

from the fibula, and from the interosseous liga-
ment ; its tendon passes into the groove of the

inner ankle, and is inserted into all the bones of
the tarsus, sending branches amongst the bones
of the tarsus and metatarsus. The tibialis anticus
has its origin from the fore part and outside of
the tibia, from the head of the fibula, and from
the interosseous ligament. Its tendon runs along
the side of the foot, and is inserted into the
os cuneiforme internum and the metatarsal bone
of the great toe.

The flexor longus pollicis arises from three-
fourths of the fibula, its tendon passing down

behind the inner ankle under the heel bone,
between the two sesamoid bones at the root of
the great toe, is inserted into its last phalanx ; it
keeps the toe firm to the ground and also bends it.

OF THE HUMAN FOOT. 247

The flexor longus digitorum pedis arises
from the back of the tibia and from the septum
tendinosum ; its tendon is formed within two
inches of the ankle, and is inserted into the
third phalanx of the four toes which they
bend.
The flexor accessorius has its origin from
the lower part of the heel bone, and is inserted
into the tendon of the flexor longus digitorum
before it divides into tendons for each toe.
The flexor brevis digitorum arises from the
lower part of the heel bone and from the plantar

aponeurosis, and is inserted into the second pha-
langes of the four toes.

The lumbricales have their origin from the
tendon of the flexor longus, and are inserted
into the sides of the first phalanges.
The extensor longus digitorum pedis arises
from the head of the tibia at its outer and
fore parts from the whole length of the fibula

248 PRACTICAL EXPOSITION

from the interosseous ligament, the fascia, and is
inserted into the first phalanx of the four
toes.
The extensor digitorum brevis springs from
the outer side and fore part of the heel bone, and
from part of the annular ligament, and is inserted

into all the phalanges of the toes, with the ex-
ception of the little one.

The extensor pollicis proprius arises from

the fibula, a little below its head, from the in-
terosseous ligament, and is inserted in the second

joint over the toe.
The abductor pollicis arises from the os calcis
and from the ligament of the naviculare, and is
inserted into the first phalanx of the toe and os
sesamoideum.
The flexor brevis pollicis has its origin from
the os cuneiforme externum and from the os
calcis, and is inserted into the sesamoid bones.
The abductor pollicis arises from the OS

OF THE HUMAN FOOT. 249

calcis, from the cuboides and cuneiforme ex-
ternum, and is inserted either into the

external sesamoid bones or the first bone of the
great toe.
The transversalis pedis arises from the fore
part of the metatarsal bone of the great toe and
the internal sesamoid, and is inserted into the

metatarsal bone of the little toe and the liga-
ment of the tarsus.

Abductor minimi digiti, from the os calcis,
inserted into the root of the first bone of the
little toe.
Flexor brevis minimi digiti arises from the
metatarsal bone of the little toe, and is inserted
into the first bone of the little toe.
The interossei interni and externi form a
web, having their origin in the metatarsal
bones, and are inserted in the tendinous
aponeurosis.
The toes form the last of the divisions of
3 s

250 PRACTICAL EXPOSITION.

the foot, and we find them disposed into three
separate bones ; they are placed in rows, and

to these the term phalanges has been appro-
priated. But whilst the toes generally have

each three phalanges, the great toe has but
two. These bones are SO made that they
have upon their lower side a flattened groove
into which the tendons of the last joint of the
toes enter. The bones situated nearest the
metatarsal bones have their articulating surfaces
as deep sockets for their reception, whilst the
articulation of the second and third joints are
hinge joints. The heads of these bones are
large, and they have a lateral projection for
the reception of the lateral ligaments. Small
bones about the size of the sesamum are
found about the toes, one on each side of
the great toe ; they seem to be inserted in

tendons, and in different places, and are sup-
posed to act as pulleys, increasing power by

OF THE HUMAN FOOT. 251

removing the acting force from the centre of
motion.
Having thus generally described the muscles
which are necessary for the performance of
those varied actions which the foot has to
perform, and which are available for all the
purposes for which that organ was framed, I
would also observe that there is a texture of
infinite importance to the muscular system,
which assists in giving pliancy and elasticity,
and which is an essential part of animal
structure ; this is the cellular substance. From
the lowest grade of vegetable life we trace this

tissue, consisting of cells formed of delicate mem-
branes. The first genus of organic products is thus

constituted, an aggregation of cells entering into
the structure of living beings. It is the medium
of communication between the vascular and nervous
system, and indeed forms the largest component
part of the frame. From this the various tissues

252 PRACTICAL EXPOSITION, &c.

are made ; and it would seem that it is the
function of the living principle to deposit cellular

tissue, from which is to be selected such por-
tions as may be necessary to supply the waste

of life. As the scale of organized beings ascends
so is vascular tissue formed from this, and all
the various parts of the body are gradually
obtained from this source. Some of the German

medical men have of late investigated this sub-
ject with peculiar ardour.
